


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















  


TD Ameritrade Institutional - Independent Registered Investment Advisor Custodian Services









































Skip to main content


















Main Content Area





Celebrate freedom all summer long.
Seize your own independence by becoming an RIA. We’ll help you get inspired with stories of advisors just like you who let true freedom ring and haven’t looked back.

Discover Their Stories







Scott Collins
TD Ameritrade Institutional



 Get a glimpse into what your transition might look like with our quick, informative tool. 
Explore your independence now






There needed to be a better way to serve clients.Discover why they chose true freedom








Introducing Veo One®
Bring your Veo integrated third-party technology onto one unified platform and gain a complete view of your clients and your business.

Learn More







Jon Patullo
TD Ameritrade Institutional



 Accessible anytime, anywhere and created with a responsive design to help you work smarter. 
Learn more about the next generation of open architecture






Become an integrated technology powerhouseSee what Veo One integrated tech providers are saying








Move beyond client satisfaction.
Understand the key drivers of engagement and create long-term client advocates for your firm.

Learn more







Vanessa Oligino
TD Ameritrade Institutional



 Building a client centric firm is about cultivating relationships beyond the financials and consistently exceeding expectations. 
Learn how we can help you transform your client experience strategy






A client-centric focus is key to engaging with clients across generations.Learn more about our program











What Makes You Super?


It’s RIAs to the rescue! Discover the hidden superpower that helps you save the day.


Unveil Your Superpower 






News



07/18/17 - TD Ameritrade Institutional Names Kate Healy to New Role: Head of NextGen and Women's Advocacy



Archives 






Upcoming Events


January 31,2018

2018 National Conference



Learn more 






Contact Us

For more information on going independent
Call Us800-934-6124


Contact us 


















































  


TD Ameritrade Institutional RIA Custodian Services: Independent RIA Support & Resources









































Skip to main content






























Overview

"We have the ear of TD Ameritrade. They are listening to what we're asking for."
Diane Pearson, Advisor, Legend Financial Advisors

Watch:
How we continue to support RIAs





Tell us where you want to take your business and we’ll help you get there.  We provide you with the tools, support, and capabilities you need to do the very best job for your clients and take your business to the next level. Your success is our business.
















Smart Operational Solutions


When you improve your operational efficiency, you can do more for your business, your clients, and your bottom line. Uncover tools and support to help you work smarter, not harder.




World Class Service,  

Trading Services,  

Clearing and Custody





Learn more








Innovative Technology


Run your business your way. We’ve designed our technology solutions to integrate seamlessly with many of the solutions providers you already use. So you can work smarter and more efficiently.




Veo®,  

Veo One®,  

Veo Open Access®,  

iRebal®,  

thinkpipes®,  

AdvisorClient®,  

Data Security





Learn more








Customized Practice Management


Maximize your business potential by working with our experienced consultants to uncover new opportunities to take your business to the next level.




Areas of Focus,  

How we Deliver





Learn more








Flexible Investment Solutions


Every client has different needs. That’s why we give you an open architecture platform - so you can access the strategies you need to choose the right investment mix for your clients.




Investment Products,  

Individual Retirement,  

Estate Planning,  

Managed Accounts,  

Research





Learn more








Steadfast Advocacy


We share your belief in the fiduciary standard and that’s why we’re dedicated to supporting Independent Registered Investment Advisors. Learn about how we advocate for RIAs.




Learn more





















Call Us:



800-934-6124



Learn more about how we can help you achieve your business vision.
Contact Us 





















































  


Benefits of Being a Break-Away Broker -  Why Become an Independent RIA









































Skip to main content






























Overview

"I don't regret one minute of it. I don't regret the decision at all."
Christopher Van Slyke, Partner and Co-Founder, WorthPointe, LLC

Watch:
Hear advisors talk about their decision





What if you could build your own business – one where you call the shots, your clients benefit, and you focus on what you enjoy? What if we helped you think through the possibilities and gave you all the support and tools you need to help you build the firm you’ve always wanted to work for? Now you can. Read on to find out how.
















Understanding Independence


What does it mean to be an RIA? Is being an RIA right for you? What is it really like? If you’re curious, these are the right questions to be asking. And you’ve come to the right place to find answers.




Advantages,  

Trends





Learn More








Considerations for Independence


There are economic and business factors to consider before you make the move. But there’s more than that - becoming an RIA is a commitment to the lifestyle, the culture, and the fiduciary standard. Let's explore if you and your clients can benefit from the RIA model.




Financial,  

Lifestyle,  

Exploring Independence





Learn More








Choosing the Right Custodian


Commitment. Coaching. Community. Doing more for you and your business is part of who we are. We’ve worked with advisors to design technology, products, and programs that can help take your practice where your ambitions lead.




Learn More





















Call Us:



800-934-6124



The path to independence begins with a conversation.
Contact Us 






Explore IndependenceJoin or Start, our Exploring Independence tool will help you decide.Get started 














































TD Ameritrade Institutional | TDA4advisors Blog





































800-934-6124
About UsContact UsBlogEventsNews 

Follow us :

Facebook
LinkedIn
Twitter
YouTube







Welcome to the
TDA4advisors Blog
We are excited to share a collection of relevant, timely, and insightful articles that can help you grow and strengthen your business. TD Ameritrade and leading industry experts will be contributing their unique perspectives on the challenges and opportunities that RIAs are facing today. Thank you for joining our community and we look forward to connecting with you!
+496  


"




"








July 19, 2017



 by Skip Schweiss 
President, TD Ameritrade Trust CompanyManaging Director of Advisor Advocacy & Industry Affairs



No Dog Days for Fiduciary Standard


To say June 2017 was a busy time for the fiduciary standard would be an understatement. It was the busiest month I’ve seen on the financial advisor regulation front in many years.
Two federal agencies, one state regulator and two influential professional organizations all announced higher standards of conduct for financial advisors. That’s encouraging, in that these moves further raise awareness about the fiduciary standard of care for investors and show that the call for a client-first approach is only gathering force.
Let’s break it down. 
Read More

+2  







July 12, 2017



by Paula Forte                
Director, Human Resources, TD Ameritrade Institutional



Loving Your Job and Loving Summer, While Enjoying Both

It’s easy to understand why people look forward to summer months. For most, it represents a time to enjoy all the treasures the season has to offer, from great weather, adventurous activities, relaxation, and travel, to time well spent with family and friends. Often, summer creates lasting memories and allows us to redeem the benefits of our hard work. From a work perspective, however, it can cause unintended stress. This can stem from covering for employees who are on vacation, worrying about unanticipated issues popping up while a co-worker is out of the office, and not missing anything important while you’re on vacation. And then there’s managing childcare needs since school is out.

Here are a few tips that may alleviate unintended strain and optimize summer enjoyment. 
Read More

+3  







July 6, 2017



by TD Ameritrade Institutional                




Congrats NextGen RIA Scholarship and Grant Winners: The Big Apple Awaits


Throw your hands in the air for the 2017 TD Ameritrade Institutional NextGen RIA Scholarship and Grant Winners!
 
Read More

+4  



Older Posts »






Search for:



Subscribe
Monthly Archives Monthly Archives

Select Month
 July 2017  (3)
 June 2017  (6)
 May 2017  (5)
 April 2017  (4)
 March 2017  (8)
 February 2017  (3)
 January 2017  (4)
 December 2016  (5)
 November 2016  (5)
 October 2016  (2)
 September 2016  (2)
 August 2016  (4)
 July 2016  (3)
 June 2016  (5)
 April 2016  (7)
 March 2016  (7)
 February 2016  (3)
 January 2016  (1)
 December 2015  (2)
 November 2015  (3)
 October 2015  (3)
 September 2015  (3)
 August 2015  (3)
 July 2015  (1)
 June 2015  (1)
 May 2015  (7)
 April 2015  (6)
 March 2015  (2)
 February 2015  (1)
 January 2015  (3)
 December 2014  (3)
 November 2014  (1)
 October 2014  (1)
 September 2014  (1)
 August 2014  (2)
 July 2014  (3)
 June 2014  (1)
 May 2014  (2)
 April 2014  (1)
 March 2014  (2)
 February 2014  (3)
 January 2014  (4)
 December 2013  (1)
 November 2013  (2)
 September 2013  (2)
 August 2013  (1)
 July 2013  (2)
 June 2013  (2)
 April 2013  (1)
 March 2013  (2)
 February 2013  (5)
 January 2013  (4)

  Recent Posts 

No Dog Days for Fiduciary Standard
July 19, 2017


Loving Your Job and Loving Summer, While Enjoying Both
July 12, 2017


Congrats NextGen RIA Scholarship and Grant Winners: The Big Apple Awaits
July 6, 2017


Getting Professional on Social Media
June 30, 2017


Make Today Your Independence Day
June 26, 2017


 

Live RR

Looking for insights on developing NextGen talent, creating career paths for growth, and encouraging their success?
This Why and How to Develop NextGen Talent: An Adviser’s Guide White Paper provides actionable steps to help you develop the right talent and structure the right roles for their future success.
+87  
 Tweets by @TDA4advisors








TD Ameritrade Institutional HomeAbout UsContact Us

Legal Info
Business Continuity Plan
Privacy
Financial Statements
TD Ameritrade Holding Corp.

The materials, views and opinions of third parties do not represent those of TD Ameritrade. TD Ameritrade and all third-parties mentioned are separate unaffiliated companies and are not responsible for each other’s services or policies.
TD Ameritrade has no control over how third parties may use information shared on the site.
TD Ameritrade Institutional, Division of TD Ameritrade, Inc., & TD Ameritrade Clearing, Inc., members FINRA/SIPC. TD Ameritrade Trust Company is a non-depository trust company and acts as a custodian and/or directed trustee. Brokerage services provided by TD Ameritrade, Inc. TD Ameritrade Trust Company and TD Ameritrade, Inc. are subsidiaries of TD Ameritrade Holding Corporation. . This is not an offer or solicitation for brokerage services, investment advisory services, or other products or services in any jurisdiction where we are not authorized to do business or where such offer or solicitation would be contrary to the securities laws or other local laws and regulations of that jurisdiction, including, but not limited to persons residing in Australia, Austria, Canada, France, Germany, Hong Kong, Italy, Japan, the Netherlands, Saudi Arabia, Singapore, or the United Kingdom. TD Ameritrade is a trademark jointly owned by TD Ameritrade IP Company, Inc. and The Toronto-Dominion Bank. © TD Ameritrade IP Company, Inc. All rights reserved. Used with permission. 36USC220506
+341  



Third-Party Site Disclosure
You are about to leave the TD Ameritrade Institutional website and enter an unaffiliated third-party website to access its products and services. The third-party site is governed by its posted privacy policy and terms of use, and the third party is solely responsible for the content and offerings on its website.
Click Continue to go to the third-party site, or click "", to return to the original website.





















  


TD Ameritrade Institutional Contact Information









































Skip to main content






























Contact Us

We're always here to answer any questions you may have.







We’re looking forward to talking with you and answering any questions you have about working with TD Ameritrade Institutional.















Contact form
Want to know more? We are here to help.

We're looking forward to talking with you and answering any questions you have about working with TD Ameritrade Institutional. The information you provide is completely confidential.




















We need a little more information from you. Please complete the required fields marked in red and try submitting again.







*First Name:





*Last Name:





*Email Address:





*Phone Number:





*Zip Code:





*Firm Name:





Role:



Please SelectAdministrationCEO or PresidentComplianceInvestment ProfessionalOperationsTechnologyTradingManagementOther



Firm Type:



Please SelectDually RegisteredFamily OfficeRegistered Investment AdvisorRegistered RepresentativeRetirement Plan AdvisorTPA/Record-keeperOther







Firm AUM: (please enter numbers only, i.e. 500M = 500000000)





I want to know more about:



Please SelectJoining/starting an RIAEvaluating a new custodian Business growth and efficiencyInnovations in technologyCorporate Retirement PlansOther



Please provide any additional questions or comments:


300 character(s) remaining.













Note: Your submission may take a few seconds to process.
Please do not click the submit button more than once























Call Us:



800-934-6124



Looking for insights to help your business?
Contact Us 









General Inquiries

Corporate Headquarters
200 S 108th Ave, Omaha, NE 68154-2631





























































Wealth Management
    



















































 






close







Search
















Wealth Management
You have meaningful goals. Our Financial Advisors can help you reach them. For over 80 years, we have worked with individuals, families, businesses and institutions—to deliver services and solutions that help build, preserve and manage wealth.
TELL ME ABOUT

                            Achieving my Financial Goals
                            


Find a Financial Advisor
Managing Everyday Finances
Building & Protecting Wealth
Planning for My Family

Business Financing & Planning
Planning for Retirement
Socially Responsible Investing



















Wealth Management

WEALTH PLANNING AS INDIVIDUAL AS YOU ARE
May 12, 2017
Your wealth plan should be based on your life and goals, not some impersonal benchmark. Get started with a Morgan Stanley Financial Advisor today.










Wealth Management

Is Your Child's Identity Secure?
Jul 21, 2017
One in four kids will encounter identity theft or fraud before turning 18. Here’s a look at some potential warning signs along with helpful strategies.










Wealth Management

5 Mistakes to Avoid in Retirement
Jul 14, 2017
How you plan your finances in retirement may be just as important as the process of saving for retirement. Here are some key considerations.














Wealth Management

Could Financials Finish Strong in 2017?
Jul 7, 2017
Loan growth, rising dividends and stronger capital market activity may signal opportunities in the lagging sector.















Wealth Management

Smart Money Moves When Traveling Abroad
Jun 30, 2017
When planning your vacation abroad, plan your money matters just like you planned your trip and you may save time, fees and a few headaches.
















Find a Financial Advisor, Branch and Private Wealth Advisor near you. Check the background of Our Firm and Investment Professionals on FINRA's Broker/Check.


Enter zipcode

Go
*Invalid zipcode















Meeting Your Needs at Every Life Stage




Goals-Based Wealth Planning
Defining your life goals and developing a truly personalized wealth strategy



InvestmentAdvice
Thought leadership to help navigate you through the most challenging market cycles



Long Term Care & Disability Insurance
Helping you plan for an uncertain future with a variety of products for managing risk



Trust and Estate Planning
Create an enduring legacy that passes on your values as well as your assets







Four Generations of Plot Twists
How do you create a wealth plan that reflects all the complexity of a  modern family? Start with a Financial Advisor who understands individuals and knows how to bring families together around both shared and personal goals. Let's have that conversation.Learn More









 


Dedicated Divisions for Clients with Unique Needs









Global Sports & Entertainment
Morgan Stanley's dedicated Wealth Management divison created to serve the unique and sophisticated needs of sports and entertainment professionals.   

Learn more









Private Wealth Management
Morgan Stanley's Private Wealth Management group helps affluent families and organizations address the complex challenges of managing financial, family and social capital.

Learn more











Ready to Start a Conversation?
Find a Financial Advisor Near You.

Filter by investment need, ZIP code or view all advisors.






Select Investment Need
Charitable Giving
Estate Planning
General Investment Advice
Help with Special Needs or Disabilities
LGBT Financial Planning
Liability Management
Navigating Divorce Finances
Pre-Liquidity Event
Retirement Planning
Socially and Environmentally Responsible Investing
Tax Planning
Wealth Transfer Planning / Inheritance
Internationally Based Investor / Family
Ultra High Net Worth Investing
Institution, Government Entity, Foundation or Endowment




Go

*Invalid zipcode




Check the background of Our Firm and Investment Professionals on FINRA's Broker/Check.





Load More


View All Advisors


        Please be advised that the selection of the Financial Advisors presented to you is done randomly and is based solely upon areas of focus that have been selected by the Financial Advisors themselves and upon their stated preferences or interests. Morgan Stanley makes no representation as to an individual Financial Advisor�s experience and/or knowledge in the stated preferences or interests they have chosen. The preferences and interests that they have chosen have not been vetted by Morgan Stanley. Individuals are encouraged to consider their own unique needs and/or specific circumstances when selecting a Financial Advisor.
    









Meet Our Thought Leaders








Profile

                                Anish
                                 
                                Shah
                            
Managing Director, Global Capital Markets
learn more







Profile

                                Mohamed
                                
                                
                            
Associate, Sales & Trading
learn more







Profile

                                Charlie
                                
                                
                            
Vice President, Global Capital Markets
learn more







Profile

                                Melanie
                                 
                                Schnoll Begun
                            
Managing Director, Head of Philanthropy Management
learn more







Profile

                                Mike
                                 
                                Wilson
                            
Chief U.S. Equity Strategist & Chief Investment Officer, Institutional Securities & Wealth Management
learn more







Profile

                                Chris
                                 
                                Roth
                            
Global Head of Credit Investing for Morgan Stanley Investment Management
learn more







Profile

                                Wei
                                 
                                Christianson
                            
CEO Morgan Stanley China, Co-CEO Morgan Stanley Asia Pacific
learn more







Profile

                                Clare
                                 
                                Woodman
                            
Chief Operating Officer of Morgan Stanley's Institutional Securities Group
learn more







Profile

                                Ruchir
                                 
                                Sharma
                            
Head of Emerging Markets and Chief Global Strategist for Morgan Stanley Investment Management
learn more







Profile

                                Ben
                                 
                                Swinburne
                            
Managing Director, Head of Media Research
learn more







Profile

                                Dimple
                                
                                
                            
Vice President, Investment Management Operations
learn more







Profile

                                Andrew
                                 
                                Sheets
                            
Managing Director, Research
learn more











Start the conversation, Find a Financial Advisor near you. Check the background of Our Firm and Investment Professionals on FINRA's Broker/Check.


Enter zipcode

Go
*Invalid zipcode















Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC (“Morgan Stanley”), its affiliates and Morgan Stanley Financial Advisors or Private Wealth Advisors do not provide tax or legal advice. Individuals should consult their tax advisor for matters involving taxation and tax planning and their attorney for matters involving trusts, estate planning, charitable giving, philanthropic planning or other legal matters.
Insurance products are offered in conjunction with Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC’s licensed insurance agency affiliates.

CRC 1685569 (01/17)
©2017 Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC, Member SIPC. All rights reserved.





Account and Service Fees


ADV Brochures and Privacy Notices


Consulting Group Capital Markets Funds Documents


Manager Profiles – Select UMA


Morgan Stanley Unit Investment Trusts: Tax Information


Mutual Fund Features, Share Classes and Compensation


Mutual Fund Revenue Sharing Arrangements


Unit Investment Trusts – Features, Costs and Compensation


Understanding Variable Annuities


Understanding Index Annuities


Understanding Your Brokerage and Investment Advisory Relationships


Understanding College Savings Plans and Compensation























Close














It Takes a Village to Raise a Graduate | Morgan Stanley
    



















































 






close







Search
















Wealth Management

May 25, 2017


It Takes a Village to Raise a College Graduate












Tweet this
Share this on LinkedIn
Share this on Facebook
Email this
Print this






                            With the rising costs of college, families are taking a multigenerational approach to planning for education and other life goals.
                        





It takes a village to raise a child, but in 2017 it may take an extended family to educate one.
With the costs of higher education trending higher each year, paying for college has become a top-tier life expense, alongside other big-ticket goals like buying a home and planning for retirement. However, education costs have now skyrocketed to the extent that saving for both of those life goals—retirement and home-buying—has become hampered in some families.




            Manage your Wealth
        


                Find a Financial Advisor, Branch and Private Wealth Advisor near you
            

Enter zipcode

Go

*Invalid zipcode





Some parents are cutting back on retirement savings contributions to help fund their children’s education.  At the same time, children are entering their 20’s with student loan debt, which in some cases is delaying the purchase of their first home. Even grandparents have modified life goals, choosing to help grandchildren with education expenses now, rather than leaving a larger legacy later.
In short, paying for education has officially become a multigenerational concern. But with a little advance planning, families can make some savvy moves to help prepare for the costs of college. 





The Growing Cost of Education



According to the College Board's latest “Trends in Higher Education" report, the continued increase in average published tuition and fees at colleges and universities is now outpacing the growth in family incomes, financial aid and many consumer goods and services. It now costs, on average, $45,370 per year for tuition, fees, room and board, for a four-year private college. Assuming a college-cost inflation rate of 3%, today’s 8-year-old child may need $255,090 come college time in 2027.
“For parents, the number-one goal from a financial planning perspective is still retirement, but close behind is paying for a child’s education,” says Marc Dextraze, Executive Director, Morgan Stanley Wealth Management Investment Solutions.




It takes a village to raise a child, but in 2017 it may take an extended family to educate one.



Tweet this




Share this on LinkedIn




Share this on Facebook




Email this







One option, says Dextraze, is for parents to start saving early with a 529 college savings plan.  “Having a head start on the costs means less sacrifice later on, avoiding the heavy burden of parental loans," he says. For the child, “Having all or most of their college funding in place means they have more options, like being able to select the college that best fits their interests and goals, as opposed to the college that offers the most aid. And graduating with less student debt means having the ability to pursue the next chapter of their lives with more financial freedom."
Named after Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, a 529 plan is a tax-advantaged savings vehicle which allows you to save, or even pay in advance, for college expenses. Earnings in a 529 plan can be tax deferred, and the withdrawals are exempt from federal and state income taxes if you use the funds for qualified expenses such as tuition, fees, room and board and supplies. Many states also offer state tax deductions or tax credits on top of that.





Making Education a Family Affair



Motivated by persistent news headlines about the growing costs of education, grandparents, relatives and even family friends have also begun creating 529 accounts in a child’s name. Not only do 529 plans offer potential tax advantages, they allow the family member or friend to give the gift of education and a young adulthood free from student debt.
“Today it definitely takes a village to send a child to college," says Jennifer Tierney, Vice President, Morgan Stanley Wealth Management Investment Solutions and 529 plans product manager. “It's so important to plan ahead. For grandparents, aunts and uncles, family friends, it just makes sense to leverage the benefits that 529 plans provide to a child and from a tax-perspective, to themselves.”





Related Reading











Wealth Management
The Real Costs of Not Saving for College








Wealth Management
When Little Geniuses Have Big Dreams






Wealth Management
How to Break the Ice Around Family Finances











A Flexible Way to Save and Invest for College



The appeal of 529 plans may derive from their benefits and flexibility.
There are no income restrictions, no required minimum distributions, no limits on the number of accounts the same person or entity can own, generally no maximum age limits for establishing an account, and high contribution limits. Virtually anyone can be named a beneficiary—a child, grandchild, niece, nephew, spouse, even a friend.1
According to Chris Stack, a managing consultant at Savingforcollege.com, one of the most overlooked benefits is the daily access and liquidity of the 529 account, as opposed to a UTMA (Uniform Transfers to Minors Act) or UGMA (Uniform Gifts to Minors Act) account or other strategy. “With 529s, grandparents or extended family give themselves an option, but not an obligation, to apply their funds to help pay college costs," he says. 


Another significant benefit of 529 plans is tax-free compounding. “Earning on an account’s growth, rather than paying taxes on the earnings, provides more funding available in future years when the college costs become a family reality," Stack says. “Having the ability to withdraw the principal and tax-deferred earnings without any federal or state income tax liability is a very significant benefit, especially when compared to alternative strategies such as using a life insurance policy or a taxable account."
Stack recommends that families start preparing for college costs as early as possible. While as soon as the child is born is ideal, he said, some even “begin with an account in their own name years before their first child is born knowing the designated beneficiary can be changed in the future."
Says Dextraze, “At the end of the day, the idea is to harmonize all of your goals, taking whatever tax advantages you can through the various kinds of plans out there, including 401Ks, 529s and others. It’s using all of the available tools. That’s how you reach your goals.”


Morgan Stanley offers many 529s from some of the nation’s leading mutual fund companies. You can choose from a range of investment strategies depending on the specific plan, the age of the beneficiary, your financial objectives and risk tolerance. Talk with your Morgan Stanley Financial Advisor, or find one using the locator below, for more information. 
















1 Some plans may have age, residency or other restrictions and may charge a fee for beneficiary changes, and beneficiary changes may result in an immediate tax liability if the new beneficiary is not a member of the old beneficiary’s family. Contribution limits vary by state. Refer to the individual plan for specific guidelines.


Disclosures
An investor should consider the investment objectives, risks, and charges and expenses associated with 529 plans and municipal fund securities before investing. More information about municipal fund securities is available in the issuer's official statement – the 529 Plan Program Disclosure – which is available from your Financial Advisor. It should be read carefully before investing.
Investments are subject to market risk and may fluctuate in value. Before investing, investors should consider whether tax or other benefits are only available for investments in the investor’s home-state 529 college savings plan. Assets can accumulate and be withdrawn federally tax-free only if they are used to pay for qualified expenses. Earnings on nonqualified distributions will be subject to income tax and a 10% federal income tax penalty. Some states offer favorable tax treatment and other benefits to their residents only if they invest in the state’s own Qualified Tuition Program. Investors should consult with their financial and tax advisor before investing in any 529 plan, or contact their state tax division for more information. Some plans may have age, residency or other restrictions and may charge a fee for beneficiary changes.
Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC (“Morgan Stanley”), its affiliates and Morgan Stanley Financial Advisors do not provide tax or legal advice. Clients should consult their personal tax advisor for tax-related matters and their attorney for legal matters.

© 2017 Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC. Member SIPC. All rights reserved.

CRC 1801034 (5/17)




View disclosures
Close disclosures


















Get Started Today.
Find a Financial Advisor Near You

Filter by investment need, ZIP code or view all advisors.






Select Investment Need
Charitable Giving
Estate Planning
General Investment Advice
Help with Special Needs or Disabilities
LGBT Financial Planning
Liability Management
Navigating Divorce Finances
Pre-Liquidity Event
Retirement Planning
Socially and Environmentally Responsible Investing
Tax Planning
Wealth Transfer Planning / Inheritance
Internationally Based Investor / Family
Ultra High Net Worth Investing
Institution, Government Entity, Foundation or Endowment




Go

*Invalid zipcode




Check the background of Our Firm and Investment Professionals on FINRA's Broker/Check.





Load More


View All Advisors


        Please be advised that the selection of the Financial Advisors presented to you is done randomly and is based solely upon areas of focus that have been selected by the Financial Advisors themselves and upon their stated preferences or interests. Morgan Stanley makes no representation as to an individual Financial Advisor�s experience and/or knowledge in the stated preferences or interests they have chosen. The preferences and interests that they have chosen have not been vetted by Morgan Stanley. Individuals are encouraged to consider their own unique needs and/or specific circumstances when selecting a Financial Advisor.
    








more stories










Wealth Management

Preparing for the Transaction of a Lifetime
May 10, 2017
Selling a business should be the reward for years of entrepreneurial savvy and hard work. Here’s how to make the process go smoothly.














Wealth Management

The Surprising Connection between Golf and Investing
May 5, 2017
Are good golfers also good investors?  A pro in both the game and the market draws out the parallels between golf and investing in the market.














Wealth Management

The State of Your Parents' Estate
May 1, 2017
Talking with a parent about estate planning is never easy.  Here are several conversation starters that can help adult children and their parents plan.















Load more articles























Close














Get Started at Morgan Stanley
    



















































 













Search













Get started
You will be assigned a Financial Advisor from Morgan Stanley to help develop your personalized financial plan. Fill out the form to get started






Goal
Build Wealth
Retirement
Save for Major Purchase
Other

Best Time to Call
Morning
Afternoon
Evening

 I'm Already a Client




Ready to talk now? Call Us.Check the background of Our Firm and Investment Professionals on FINRA’s Broker/Check.








It all starts with a conversation
We’ll help you create a tailored wealth strategy designed for today—that’s flexible enough to grow with you in the future. 


					    Find a Morgan Stanley Financial Advisor
					

Find a Morgan Stanley Financial Advisor

We can help you prepare for life’s journeys. Enter your information here and a Financial Advisor will get in touch.







Goal
Build Wealth
Retirement
Save for Major Purchase
Other

Best Time to Call
Morning
Afternoon
Evening

 I'm Already a Client





Ready to talk now? Call Us
Check the background of Our Firm and Investment Professionals on FINRA’s Broker/Check.











Visualize the financial future you want–and let us help you work toward achieving it
What’s important to you? A Morgan Stanley Financial Advisor can work with you and your family to understand your goals, as well as your unique needs, dynamics and values. We’ll help you build a strong foundation to help you prepare for the challenges you are facing today, as well as set you on the path toward reaching your financial aspirations for the future.
We believe a successful financial strategy should:







Cater to your unique situationFamily, career, legacy, philanthropy—what matters to you? We’ll help you define those priorities and develop a truly personalized wealth strategy that reflects what you care about most.
Prepare you for the unknownWhen life’s unforeseen events pop up, we’ll help you monitor and adjust your course. From life changes to market slowdowns and more, we will help you prepare.
Guide you through challenging marketsWhen markets shift, it’s easy to get lost in uncertainty. We provide investment advice to help you avoid common pitfalls, and identify opportunities to help maximize your growth.





























Close











﻿




























American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Has $234,000 Stake in Chart Industries, Inc. (GTLS) - Week Herald














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings and News for Chart Industries Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Chart Industries Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @WeekHerald









Recent Posts

Canal Capital Management LLC Sells 350 Shares of Philip Morris International Inc (PM)
TNB Financial Purchases 4,006 Shares of Wal-Mart Stores, Inc. (WMT)
Mastercard Incorporated (MA) is Intermede Investment Partners Ltd’s 3rd Largest Position
North American Management Corp Maintains Position in Wal-Mart Stores, Inc. (WMT)
CVS Health Corporation (CVS) Position Raised by Smithbridge Asset Management Inc. DE
North American Management Corp Continues to Hold Stake in Oracle Corporation (ORCL)
V Wealth Management LLC Sells 4,612 Shares of AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
Ronna Sue Cohen Increases Stake in United Technologies Corporation (UTX)
American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Has $234,000 Stake in Chart Industries, Inc. (GTLS)
American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Holds Position in Enbridge Energy, L.P. (EEP)
V Wealth Management LLC Purchases New Position in United Technologies Corporation (UTX)
BerganKDV Wealth Management LLC Has $1.07 Million Stake in United Technologies Corporation (UTX)
CVS Health Corporation (CVS) Stake Increased by BerganKDV Wealth Management LLC
CVS Health Corporation (CVS) is Ronna Sue Cohen’s 3rd Largest Position
Freeport-McMoran, Inc. (FCX) Position Maintained by American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.
American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Continues to Hold Stake in Regions Financial Corporation (RF)
Cohen Klingenstein LLC Has $18,161,000 Stake in Pepsico, Inc. (PEP)
American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Holds Stake in Hess Corporation (HES)
FMC Technologies, Inc. (FTI) Shares Sold by American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.
American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Maintains Stake in Enable Midstream Partners, LP (ENBL)



 


American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Has $234,000 Stake in Chart Industries, Inc. (GTLS)

					Posted by Rex Bailey on Jul 22nd, 2017 // No Comments 


Tweet












American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. held its position in shares of  Chart Industries, Inc. (NASDAQ:GTLS) during the second quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund owned 6,740 shares of the industrial products company’s stock at the end of the second quarter. American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.’s holdings in Chart Industries were worth $234,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Several other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also recently modified their holdings of GTLS. Vanguard Group Inc. raised its position in shares of  Chart Industries by 8.8% in the first quarter. Vanguard Group Inc. now owns 3,842,890 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $134,271,000 after buying an additional 310,641 shares during the period.  Dimensional Fund Advisors LP increased its stake in shares of  Chart Industries by 10.7% in the first quarter. Dimensional Fund Advisors LP now owns 2,089,590 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $73,010,000 after buying an additional 201,528 shares in the last quarter.  Norges Bank acquired a new stake in shares of  Chart Industries during the fourth quarter valued at $26,309,000.  State Street Corp increased its stake in shares of  Chart Industries by 9.4% in the fourth quarter. State Street Corp now owns 722,191 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $26,014,000 after buying an additional 62,071 shares in the last quarter.  Finally, Canada Pension Plan Investment Board increased its stake in shares of  Chart Industries by 2.1% in the first quarter. Canada Pension Plan Investment Board now owns 309,000 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $10,796,000 after buying an additional 6,300 shares in the last quarter. 86.76% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Chart Industries Inc. alerts:



Shares of Chart Industries, Inc. (NASDAQ:GTLS) opened at 34.83 on Friday. Chart Industries, Inc. has a 1-year low of $24.36 and a 1-year high of $40.87. The company has a 50 day moving average of $34.86 and a 200 day moving average of $35.90. The firm has a market cap of $1.07 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 35.98 and a beta of 1.28. 




Chart Industries (NASDAQ:GTLS) last issued its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, April 27th. The industrial products company reported $0.01 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, missing the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $0.02 by $0.01. Chart Industries had a return on equity of 5.56% and a net margin of 3.45%. The company had revenue of $204.10 million for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $198.57 million. During the same period in the prior year, the company earned ($0.08) EPS. The firm’s revenue was up 5.3% on a year-over-year basis.  On average, equities analysts forecast that  Chart Industries, Inc. will post $0.75 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION WARNING: This piece was first  reported by Week Herald and is owned by of Week Herald. If you are reading this piece on another site, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of international copyright & trademark legislation. The correct version of this piece can be viewed at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/22/american-national-registered-investment-advisor-inc-has-234000-stake-in-chart-industries-inc-gtls.html. 
Several analysts have recently weighed in on GTLS shares. Zacks Investment Research upgraded Chart Industries from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $40.00 target price for the company in a research note on Wednesday, April 26th. Johnson Rice upgraded Chart Industries from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and lifted their price target for the stock from $40.00 to $42.00 in a research note on Thursday, June 29th. One research analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, five have given a hold rating and three have assigned  a buy rating to the stock. The stock currently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $39.14.
Chart Industries Company Profile
Chart Industries, Inc is a diversified global manufacturer of engineered equipment, packaged solutions, and value-add services used throughout the industrial gas, energy and biomedical industries. The Company operates through three business segments: Energy & Chemicals (E&C), Distribution & Storage (D&S) and BioMedical.







Receive News & Ratings for Chart Industries Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Chart Industries Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




Canal Capital Management LLC Sells 350 Shares of Philip Morris International Inc 





Mastercard Incorporated  is Intermede Investment Partners Ltd’s 3rd Largest Position





TNB Financial Purchases 4,006 Shares of Wal-Mart Stores, Inc. 





North American Management Corp Continues to Hold Stake in Oracle Corporation 





CVS Health Corporation  Position Raised by Smithbridge Asset Management Inc. DE





North American Management Corp Maintains Position in Wal-Mart Stores, Inc. 






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 
































﻿




























American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Continues to Hold Stake in Mohawk Industries, Inc. (NYSE:MHK) - StockNewsTimes














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings & News for Mohawk Industries Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Mohawk Industries Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @StockNewTimes









Recent Posts

UBM Plc (LON:UBM) Scheduled to Post Quarterly Earnings on Thursday
Bryan, Garnier & Co Boosts GlaxoSmithKline plc (GSK) Price Target to GBX 1,790
NBT Bancorp Inc. (NASDAQ:NBTB) Receives Consensus Rating of “Hold” from Analysts
Equity Residential (EQR) Issues Q3 Earnings Guidance
NXP Semiconductors N.V. (NXPI) Given Consensus Recommendation of “Hold” by Brokerages
Coca-Cola Company (The) (NYSE:KO) Receives $45.17 Consensus PT from Brokerages
SL Green Realty Corporation (NYSE:SLG) Receives Consensus Recommendation of “Hold” from Analysts
Silicon Laboratories, Inc. (NASDAQ:SLAB) Receives Consensus Recommendation of “Buy” from Analysts
Match Group (NASDAQ:MTCH) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Report Shows
Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Affect Teledyne Technologies (TDY) Share Price
NCR Corporation (NCR) Receives Media Sentiment Score of 0.14
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TXN) Issues Q3 Earnings Guidance
QUALCOMM Incorporated (NASDAQ:QCOM) Downgraded by ValuEngine
Ensco Plc (ESV) Lifted to Hold at ValuEngine
Kawasaki Heavy Industries Ltd (OTCMKTS:KWHIY) Upgraded to “Buy” at ValuEngine
$0.16 EPS Expected for Bank of Commerce Holdings (CA) (NASDAQ:BOCH) This Quarter
China Southern Airlines Company Limited (ZNH) and Gol Linhas Aereas Inteligentes (GOL) Head-To-Head Comparison
Critical Analysis: VOXX International Corporation (NASDAQ:VOXX) vs. U.S. Auto Parts Network (PRTS)
Reviewing Vivint Solar (VSLR) and Comp En De Mn Cemig ADS (CIG)
Avnet (NYSE:AVT) Receiving Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Report Shows



 


American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Continues to Hold Stake in Mohawk Industries, Inc. (NYSE:MHK)

					Posted by Mandy Boone on Jul 20th, 2017 // No Comments 



American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. continued to hold its position in  Mohawk Industries, Inc. (NYSE:MHK) during the second quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 2,080 shares of the company’s stock at the end of the second quarter. American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.’s holdings in Mohawk Industries were worth $503,000 as of its most recent filing with the SEC. 
A number of other institutional investors have also bought and sold shares of the company. Vanguard Group Inc. raised its position in  Mohawk Industries by 3.2% in the first quarter. Vanguard Group Inc. now owns 5,987,177 shares of the company’s stock worth $1,373,997,000 after buying an additional 185,698 shares in the last quarter.  JPMorgan Chase & Co. raised its position in  Mohawk Industries by 3.6% in the first quarter. JPMorgan Chase & Co. now owns 4,616,502 shares of the company’s stock worth $1,059,441,000 after buying an additional 159,231 shares in the last quarter.  BlackRock Inc. raised its position in  Mohawk Industries by 3,286.0% in the first quarter. BlackRock Inc. now owns 4,324,509 shares of the company’s stock worth $992,431,000 after buying an additional 4,196,790 shares in the last quarter.  FMR LLC raised its position in  Mohawk Industries by 5.5% in the first quarter. FMR LLC now owns 2,690,837 shares of the company’s stock worth $617,520,000 after buying an additional 139,080 shares in the last quarter.  Finally, Egerton Capital UK LLP raised its position in  Mohawk Industries by 3.1% in the first quarter. Egerton Capital UK LLP now owns 1,432,719 shares of the company’s stock worth $328,795,000 after buying an additional 42,925 shares in the last quarter. 77.05% of the stock is owned by institutional investors. 


 Get Mohawk Industries Inc. alerts:



Shares of Mohawk Industries, Inc. (MHK) opened at 247.89 on Thursday. The stock’s market cap is $18.42 billion. Mohawk Industries, Inc. has a one year low of $175.52 and a one year high of $249.61. The company has a 50-day moving average of $243.24 and a 200 day moving average of $229.50. 




Mohawk Industries (NYSE:MHK) last released its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, April 27th. The company reported $2.72 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $2.71 by $0.01. The firm had revenue of $2.22 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $2.27 billion. Mohawk Industries had a return on equity of 16.88% and a net margin of 10.65%. Mohawk Industries’s revenue was up 2.2% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the prior year, the business posted $2.38 earnings per share.  On average, equities analysts forecast that  Mohawk Industries, Inc. will post $13.36 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This story was  reported by StockNewsTimes and is the property of of StockNewsTimes. If you are viewing this story on another website, it was stolen and reposted in violation of international trademark & copyright laws. The legal version of this story can be accessed at https://stocknewstimes.com/2017/07/20/american-national-registered-investment-advisor-inc-continues-to-hold-stake-in-mohawk-industries-inc-nysemhk.html. 
MHK has been the subject of a number of recent research reports. Instinet  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $280.00 price target on shares of Mohawk Industries in a research report on Friday, April 14th. BidaskClub raised shares of Mohawk Industries from a “buy” rating to a “strong-buy” rating in a research report on Wednesday, July 12th. Royal Bank Of Canada  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $267.00 price target on shares of Mohawk Industries in a research report on Monday, May 1st. Zacks Investment Research raised shares of Mohawk Industries from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $268.00 price target for the company in a research report on Tuesday, July 4th. Finally, MKM Partners  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $255.00 price target on shares of Mohawk Industries in a research report on Tuesday, April 18th. One equities research analyst  has rated the stock with a hold rating, thirteen have issued  a buy rating and one  has issued  a strong buy rating to the company’s stock. The company presently has an average rating of “Buy” and an average price target of $260.67.
In other Mohawk Industries news, VP Rodney David Patton sold 387 shares of the stock in a transaction on Friday, June 16th. The stock was sold at an average price of $242.00, for a total value of $93,654.00. Following the completion of the transaction, the vice president now owns 7,061 shares in the company, valued at $1,708,762. The transaction was disclosed in a document filed with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available at this hyperlink. Also, insider Suzanne L. Helen sold 6,200 shares of the stock in a transaction on Friday, June 9th. The stock was sold at an average price of $240.62, for a total value of $1,491,844.00. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders sold 7,587 shares of company stock valued at $1,823,768 in the last quarter. 17.10% of the stock is currently owned by company insiders. 
About Mohawk Industries
Mohawk Industries, Inc is a flooring manufacturer that creates products for residential and commercial spaces around the world. The Company’ segments include Global Ceramic, Flooring North America (Flooring NA) and Flooring Rest of the World (Flooring ROW). Its manufacturing and distribution processes provide carpet, rugs, ceramic tile, laminate, wood, stone, luxury vinyl tile and vinyl flooring.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding MHK? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Mohawk Industries, Inc. (NYSE:MHK).







Receive News & Ratings for Mohawk Industries Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Mohawk Industries Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 










































﻿




























American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Has $209,000 Stake in Ship Finance International Limited (SFL) - Week Herald














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings and News for Ship Finance International Limited
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Ship Finance International Limited with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @WeekHerald









Recent Posts

Athelney Trust PLC (LON:ATY) Scheduled to Post Earnings on Monday
UBS AG Reiterates “€72.00” Price Target for RTL Group S.A. (RTL)
Intesa Sanpaolo SpA (ISP) PT Set at €3.40 by Morgan Stanley
Deutsche Bank AG Reiterates “€50.00” Price Target for Societe Generale SA (EPA:GLE)
Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) Analysts Give ASML Holding (AMSL) a €144.00 Price Target
Peel Hunt Reiterates Reduce Rating for Beazley PLC (BEZ)
The Hain Celestial Group, Inc. (HAIN) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Analysts
$104.96 Million in Sales Expected for Teekay LNG Partners L.P. (NYSE:TGP) This Quarter
Navios Maritime Midstream Partners LP (NAP) Expected to Post Quarterly Sales of $21.34 Million
Achillion Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (ACHN) Receives Consensus Recommendation of “Buy” from Analysts
Brokerages Set Brink’s Company (The) (NYSE:BCO) PT at $70.00
Deutsche Pfandbriefbank AG (FRA:PBB) Given Average Recommendation of “Hold” by Brokerages
Liberty Media Corporation (NASDAQ:BATRK) Given Average Recommendation of “Sell” by Brokerages
FCB Financial Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:FCB) Given Average Recommendation of “Hold” by Analysts
OpenTable (NASDAQ:OPEN) versus J2 Global (JCOM) Head-To-Head Comparison
QTS Realty Trust (QTS) versus InfraREIT (NYSE:HIFR) Financial Contrast
Kornit Digital (KRNT) versus The ExOne (XONE) Head-To-Head Contrast
Zacks: Ceragon Networks Ltd. (CRNT) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Analysts
Aritzia Inc (TSE:ATZ) Receives C$22.43 Average PT from Brokerages
Brokerages Set Pandora Media, Inc. (NYSE:P) Price Target at $12.97



 


American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Has $209,000 Stake in Ship Finance International Limited (SFL)

					Posted by Rex Bailey on Jul 22nd, 2017 // No Comments 


Tweet












American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. held its position in  Ship Finance International Limited (NYSE:SFL) during the second quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 15,380 shares of the shipping company’s stock at the end of the second quarter. American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.’s holdings in Ship Finance International Limited were worth $209,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
A number of other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Quantbot Technologies LP purchased a new position in  Ship Finance International Limited during the first quarter worth $124,000.  Stifel Financial Corp purchased a new position in  Ship Finance International Limited during the first quarter worth $160,000.  Geneva Advisors LLC raised its position in  Ship Finance International Limited by 1.4% in the first quarter. Geneva Advisors LLC now owns 12,335 shares of the shipping company’s stock worth $181,000 after buying an additional 176 shares in the last quarter.  Principal Financial Group Inc. purchased a new position in  Ship Finance International Limited during the first quarter worth $186,000.  Finally, CWA Asset Management Group LLC raised its position in  Ship Finance International Limited by 31.6% in the first quarter. CWA Asset Management Group LLC now owns 13,755 shares of the shipping company’s stock worth $202,000 after buying an additional 3,300 shares in the last quarter. 26.92% of the stock is owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get Ship Finance International Limited alerts:



Ship Finance International Limited (NYSE SFL) opened at 13.40 on Friday. Ship Finance International Limited has a 12 month low of $12.07 and a 12 month high of $16.10. The firm has a market cap of $1.25 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 9.70 and a beta of 1.38. The stock’s 50 day moving average is $13.23 and its 200-day moving average is $14.16. 




Ship Finance International Limited (NYSE:SFL) last posted its earnings results on Tuesday, May 30th. The shipping company reported $0.35 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.32 by $0.03. The company had revenue of $96.88 million during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $102.70 million. Ship Finance International Limited had a net margin of 33.62% and a return on equity of 12.65%.  On average, analysts anticipate that  Ship Finance International Limited will post $1.03 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
The business also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Thursday, June 29th. Stockholders of record on Friday, June 16th were paid a dividend of $0.45 per share. This represents a $1.80 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 13.43%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend  was Wednesday, June 14th. Ship Finance International Limited’s dividend payout ratio  is presently 125.88%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: “American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Has $209,000 Stake in Ship Finance International Limited (SFL)” was originally  published by Week Herald and is the sole property of of Week Herald. If you are accessing this news story on another domain, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of U.S. and international trademark and copyright law. The original version of this news story can be read at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/22/american-national-registered-investment-advisor-inc-has-209000-stake-in-ship-finance-international-limited-sfl.html. 
A number of research analysts have weighed in on the stock. ValuEngine lowered shares of Ship Finance International Limited from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Friday, June 2nd. Jefferies Group LLC raised shares of Ship Finance International Limited to a “hold” rating and set a $15.00 target price for the company in a research report on Monday, June 5th. BidaskClub raised shares of Ship Finance International Limited from a “strong sell” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Tuesday, June 13th. Finally, Zacks Investment Research raised shares of Ship Finance International Limited from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Wednesday, April 26th. Five investment analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and one  has assigned  a buy rating to the stock. The stock  has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $15.67.
Ship Finance International Limited Company Profile
Ship Finance International Limited is a holding, and international ship owning and chartering company. The Company is engaged in the ownership and operation of vessels and offshore related assets, and also involved in the charter, purchase and sale of assets. Its assets consist of approximately 20 oil tankers, over 20 dry bulk carriers, approximately 20 container vessels, including a newbuilding, two car carriers, two jack-up drilling rigs, two ultra-deepwater drilling units, five offshore supply vessels, two chemical tankers and two newbuilding oil product tankers.







Receive News & Ratings for Ship Finance International Limited Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Ship Finance International Limited and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




Athelney Trust PLC  Scheduled to Post Earnings on Monday





Deutsche Bank AG Reiterates “€50.00” Price Target for Societe Generale SA 





Intesa Sanpaolo SpA  PT Set at €3.40 by Morgan Stanley





UBS AG Reiterates “€72.00” Price Target for RTL Group S.A. 





Peel Hunt Reiterates Reduce Rating for Beazley PLC 





Goldman Sachs Group, Inc.  Analysts Give ASML Holding  a €144.00 Price Target






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 







































American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Continues to Hold Position in Edison International (NYSE:EIX) | Daily Political











































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















Edison International - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Edison International with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Recent Research Analysts’ Ratings Changes for Premier Oil PLC (PMO)					

Maiden Holdings, Ltd. (MHLD) Receives Average Recommendation of “Hold” from Brokerages					

Brokerages Set SL Green Realty Corporation (SLG) PT at $114.10					

Computer Programs and Systems, Inc. (NASDAQ:CPSI) Receives Consensus Rating of “Hold” from Analysts					

CACI International, Inc. (NYSE:CACI) Expected to Post Quarterly Sales of $1.09 Billion					

Hudson Pacific Properties (NYSE:HPP) Getting Somewhat Positive Press Coverage, Accern Reports					

Compania Cervecerias Unidas, (CCU) Earning Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Report Shows					

WEX (WEX) Earning Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Report Shows					

EastGroup Properties, Inc. (EGP) Releases FY17 Earnings Guidance					

Zacks: Analysts Anticipate Brixmor Property Group Inc. (NYSE:BRX) to Announce $0.51 Earnings Per Share					

Analysts Anticipate Box, Inc. (NYSE:BOX) to Announce -$0.29 EPS					

Head-To-Head Comparison: Lifetime Brands (LCUT) versus Helen of Troy Limited (HELE)					

Comparing BG Medicine (BGMD) & Signal Genetics (NASDAQ:MGEN)					

Potlatch Corporation (PCH) and Weyerhaeuser (WY) Head to Head Review					

Equity Residential (EQR) Releases FY17 Earnings Guidance					

Masimo Corporation (MASI) Receiving Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Analysis Finds					

Somewhat Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Vectren Corporation (NYSE:VVC) Share Price					

Sonoco Products (NYSE:SON) Receives News Impact Score of 0.14					

Somewhat Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Affect Booz Allen Hamilton Holding Corporation (BAH) Share Price					

voxeljet AG (VJET) Stock Rating Upgraded by ValuEngine					





 





						American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Continues to Hold Position in Edison International (NYSE:EIX)					

						 July 17th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Trevor Kearing 


							Filed Under: Finance - SEC Filing Articles 







Tweet










American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. maintained its position in shares of  Edison International (NYSE:EIX) during the second quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The firm owned 13,025 shares of the utilities provider’s stock at the end of the second quarter. American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.’s holdings in Edison International were worth $1,018,000 as of its most recent filing with the SEC. 
Several other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also made changes to their positions in the company. Guardian Life Insurance Co. of America increased its position in shares of  Edison International by 0.6% in the first quarter. Guardian Life Insurance Co. of America now owns 1,256 shares of the utilities provider’s stock valued at $100,000 after buying an additional 8 shares during the last quarter.  Jones Collombin Investment Counsel Inc increased its position in shares of  Edison International by 69.4% in the first quarter. Jones Collombin Investment Counsel Inc now owns 1,745 shares of the utilities provider’s stock valued at $139,000 after buying an additional 715 shares during the last quarter.  Wayne Hummer Investments L.L.C. acquired a new position in shares of  Edison International during the first quarter valued at approximately $200,000.  Parallel Advisors LLC increased its position in shares of  Edison International by 41.7% in the first quarter. Parallel Advisors LLC now owns 2,517 shares of the utilities provider’s stock valued at $198,000 after buying an additional 741 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, Gofen & Glossberg LLC IL acquired a new position in shares of  Edison International during the first quarter valued at approximately $201,000. 81.60% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 
Shares of Edison International (NYSE EIX) traded up 0.50% during trading on Monday, hitting $77.84. 1,733,772 shares of the stock traded hands. The firm has a 50-day moving average of $80.18 and a 200-day moving average of $77.33. The firm has a market capitalization of $25.36 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 18.44 and a beta of 0.23. Edison International has a 1-year low of $67.44 and a 1-year high of $82.82. 




Edison International (NYSE:EIX) last announced its quarterly earnings results on Monday, May 1st. The utilities provider reported $1.10 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.89 by $0.21. The business had revenue of $2.46 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $2.71 billion. Edison International had a return on equity of 10.78% and a net margin of 12.82%. The business’s revenue was up .9% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter last year, the business posted $0.82 EPS.  On average, equities analysts forecast that  Edison International will post $4.21 earnings per share for the current year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, July 31st. Investors of record on Friday, June 30th will be given a $0.5425 dividend. This represents a $2.17 annualized dividend and a yield of 2.79%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, June 28th. Edison International’s dividend payout ratio  is currently 50.94%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION WARNING: This story was originally  posted by Daily Political and is the sole property of of Daily Political. If you are accessing this story on another website, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of U.S. & international copyright & trademark legislation. The correct version of this story can be viewed at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/17/american-national-registered-investment-advisor-inc-continues-to-hold-position-in-edison-international-nyseeix.html. 
Several research analysts have recently commented on the company. UBS AG downgraded Edison International from a “buy” rating to a “neutral” rating and reduced their target price for the stock from $82.00 to $80.00 in a report on Wednesday, May 17th. Jefferies Group LLC  reissued a “hold” rating on shares of Edison International in a report on Friday. Zacks Investment Research raised Edison International from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $86.00 target price on the stock in a report on Thursday, July 6th. Morgan Stanley  reissued an “equal weight” rating on shares of Edison International in a report on Tuesday, July 11th. Finally, BidaskClub upgraded shares of Edison International from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Monday, June 19th. One equities research analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, nine have given a hold rating and five have given a buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $82.63.
In related news, insider Ronald L. Litzinger sold 26,035 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Monday, May 15th. The stock was sold at an average price of $78.85, for a total value of $2,052,859.75. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which is available through this link. Also, insider Gaddi H. Vasquez sold 2,500 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Thursday, June 8th. The shares were sold at an average price of $81.30, for a total value of $203,250.00. Following the completion of the sale, the insider now owns 4,550 shares in the company, valued at $369,915. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Over the last 90 days, insiders sold 31,035 shares of company stock worth $2,460,285. 0.41% of the stock is owned by insiders. 
Edison International Company Profile
Edison International is the holding company of Southern California Edison Company (SCE). As of December 31, 2016, SCE, a public utility, was primarily engaged in the business of supplying and delivering electricity to an approximately 50,000 square mile area of southern California. The Company is also the parent company of Edison Energy Group, Inc (Edison Energy Group), a holding company for subsidiaries engaged in pursuing competitive business opportunities across energy services and distributed solar to commercial and industrial customers.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding EIX? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Edison International (NYSE:EIX).






Receive News & Ratings for Edison International Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Edison International and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 
























































﻿







American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc – Octafinance


















































 








Wednesday, 26 July 2017

























 

Menu



Featured News


						2 years ago - Alphabet Inc (NASDAQ:GOOGL) Tests Its Ad Technology On Billboards To Cushion Itself Against Ad Blocks


						2 years ago - China Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking Crisis


						2 years ago - Marc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and Gold


						2 years ago - Carl Icahn Criticizes the Fed. Feels Bad For Investors Buying Junk Bonds


						2 years ago - John Burbank: European QE Can’t Save The Markets Same As the U.S. Quantitative Easing. Everything Will Be Liquidated









Home » Hedge Funds » American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc 

American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc 

Share with your friendsYour NameYour EmailRecipient EmailEnter a MessageI read this article and found it very interesting, thought it might be interesting for you. The article is called American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc and is was published by Octafinance.com at http://www.octafinance.com/hedge-funds/american-national-registered-investment-advisor-inc/.CaptchaSubmitAmerican National Registered Investment Advisor Inc is a Texas-based institutional investor with more than $253.39 million AUM in March, 2014. Taken from American National Registered Investment Advisor latest Adv, the fund reported to have 19 full and part-time employees. Among which 7 performing investment advisory and research functions. The institutional investor had between 26-100 clients.






Portfolio Q32016Market Value:$214,388,000Previous Mkt Value:$215,223,000Chg Mkt Value %:-0.39 % Sentiment:BearishTurnover %:0.64 %




Stocks ActivityNew Purchases:6Additional Purchases:1Sold out:13Reduced:50Top 10 Holdings %:16.35%






American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc Portfolio Holdings
13F Report Date: 9/30/2016



RANKTICKER / SECURITYTICKERVALUE (X1000)SHARES% PORT% PREV% AUM% CHGCHG 
SHARESCHGSECTOR NAMESECTOR WEIGHT 



RANKTICKER / SECURITYTICKERVALUE (X1000)SHARES% PORT% PREV% AUM% CHGCHG 
SHARESCHGSECTOR NAMESECTOR WEIGHT 




                    1		

                    AAPL - Apple Inc		

                    AAPL		

                    5,796		

                    51,268		

                    2.70		

                    2.28		

                    2.29		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		

                    INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY		

                    0.16		



                    2		

                    MSFT - Microsoft Corp		

                    MSFT		

                    4,435		

                    76,996		

                    2.07		

                    1.90		

                    1.75		

                    -3.75		

                    -3,000		

                    Down		

                    UTILITIES & TELECOMMUNICATIONS		

                    0.09		



                    3		

                    T - AT&T Inc.		

                    T		

                    3,542		

                    87,227		

                    1.65		

                    1.78		

                    1.40		

                    -1.45		

                    -1,280		

                    Down		

                    HEALTH CARE		

                    0.11		



                    4		

                    JNJ - Johnson & Johnson		

                    JNJ		

                    3,464		

                    29,325		

                    1.62		

                    1.65		

                    1.37		

                    -0.12		

                    -35		

                    Down		

                    INDUSTRIALS		

                    0.07		



                    5		

                    GE - General Electric Co.		

                    GE		

                    3,253		

                    109,812		

                    1.52		

                    1.61		

                    1.28		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		

                    CONSUMER DISCRETIONARY		

                    0.11		



                    6		

                    HD - Home Depot Inc.		

                    HD		

                    3,159		

                    24,546		

                    1.47		

                    1.52		

                    1.25		

                    -3.93		

                    -1,005		

                    Down		

                    CONSUMER STAPLES		

                    0.09		



                    7		

                    MO - Altria Group Inc.		

                    MO		

                    2,959		

                    46,800		

                    1.38		

                    1.53		

                    1.17		

                    -1.73		

                    -825		

                    Down		

                    ENERGY		

                    0.08		



                    8		

                    XOM - Exxon Mobil Corp.		

                    XOM		

                    2,908		

                    33,318		

                    1.36		

                    1.46		

                    1.15		

                    -0.52		

                    -175		

                    Down		

                    FINANCE		

                    0.19		



                    9		

                    JPM - JPMorgan Chase & Co.		

                    JPM		

                    2,880		

                    43,246		

                    1.34		

                    1.28		

                    1.14		

                    -2.09		

                    -923		

                    Down		

                    MATERIALS		

                    0.03		



                    10		

                    PFE - Pfizer Inc.		

                    PFE		

                    2,667		

                    78,749		

                    1.24		

                    1.29		

                    1.05		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		

                    TRANSPORTS		

                    0.02		



                    11		

                    PG - Procter & Gamble Inc.		

                    PG		

                    2,377		

                    26,490		

                    1.11		

                    1.07		

                    0.94		

                    -2.48		

                    -675		

                    Down		

                    SERVICES		

                    0.00		



                    12		

                    FB - Facebook Inc		

                    FB		

                    2,286		

                    17,818		

                    1.07		

                    0.95		

                    0.90		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    13		

                    CVX - Chevron Corp.		

                    CVX		

                    2,201		

                    21,390		

                    1.03		

                    1.04		

                    0.87		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    14		

                    DIS - Walt Disney Co.		

                    DIS		

                    2,195		

                    23,635		

                    1.02		

                    1.11		

                    0.87		

                    -3.27		

                    -800		

                    Down		







                    15		

                    BA - Boeing Company		

                    BA		

                    2,184		

                    16,578		

                    1.02		

                    1.01		

                    0.86		

                    -1.37		

                    -230		

                    Down		







                    16		

                    MRK - Merck & Co. Inc.		

                    MRK		

                    2,138		

                    34,250		

                    1.00		

                    0.92		

                    0.84		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    17		

                    INTC - Intel Corp.		

                    INTC		

                    2,129		

                    56,386		

                    0.99		

                    0.88		

                    0.84		

                    -2.77		

                    -1,605		

                    Down		







                    18		

                    NOC - Northrop Grumman Corp.		

                    NOC		

                    2,055		

                    9,605		

                    0.96		

                    1.01		

                    0.81		

                    -1.59		

                    -155		

                    Down		







                    19		

                    HON - Honeywell International Inc.		

                    HON		

                    2,048		

                    17,566		

                    0.96		

                    0.98		

                    0.81		

                    -3.22		

                    -585		

                    Down		







                    20		

                    VZ - Verizon Communications Inc		

                    VZ		

                    2,041		

                    39,265		

                    0.95		

                    1.04		

                    0.81		

                    -2.12		

                    -850		

                    Down		







                    21		

                    PEP - PepsiCo Inc.		

                    PEP		

                    2,034		

                    18,698		

                    0.95		

                    0.94		

                    0.80		

                    -2.15		

                    -410		

                    Down		







                    22		

                    PRU - Prudential Financial Inc.		

                    PRU		

                    1,978		

                    24,230		

                    0.92		

                    0.80		

                    0.78		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    23		

                    TXN - Texas Instruments		

                    TXN		

                    1,967		

                    28,033		

                    0.92		

                    0.85		

                    0.78		

                    -4.27		

                    -1,250		

                    Down		







                    24		

                    AMZN - Amazon.com Inc.		

                    AMZN		

                    1,925		

                    2,299		

                    0.90		

                    0.76		

                    0.76		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    25		

                    CSCO - Cisco Systems		

                    CSCO		

                    1,920		

                    60,541		

                    0.90		

                    0.81		

                    0.76		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    26		

                    LLY - Lilly (Eli) & Co.		

                    LLY		

                    1,897		

                    23,641		

                    0.88		

                    0.87		

                    0.75		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    27		

                    WFC - Wells Fargo Co.		

                    WFC		

                    1,838		

                    41,513		

                    0.86		

                    0.94		

                    0.73		

                    -2.70		

                    -1,150		

                    Down		







                    28		

                    PPG - PPG Industries Inc.		

                    PPG		

                    1,804		

                    17,450		

                    0.84		

                    0.88		

                    0.71		

                    -3.78		

                    -685		

                    Down		







                    29		

                    CELG - Celgene Corp.		

                    CELG		

                    1,793		

                    17,155		

                    0.84		

                    0.83		

                    0.71		

                    -4.85		

                    -875		

                    Down		







                    30		

                    Alphabet Inc Class A		



                    1,746		

                    2,172		

                    0.81		

                    0.71		

                    0.69		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    31		

                    Alphabet Inc Class C		



                    1,707		

                    2,196		

                    0.80		

                    0.71		

                    0.67		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    32		

                    KO - Coca-Cola		

                    KO		

                    1,701		

                    40,196		

                    0.79		

                    0.85		

                    0.67		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    33		

                    MCD - McDonald's Corp.		

                    MCD		

                    1,681		

                    14,568		

                    0.78		

                    0.81		

                    0.66		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    34		

                    LOW - Lowe's Co.		

                    LOW		

                    1,612		

                    22,325		

                    0.75		

                    0.89		

                    0.64		

                    -7.69		

                    -1,860		

                    Down		







                    35		

                    PNC - PNC Financial Services Group		

                    PNC		

                    1,585		

                    17,599		

                    0.74		

                    0.67		

                    0.63		

                    -0.14		

                    -25		

                    Down		







                    36		

                    MMC - Marsh & McLennan Companies In		

                    MMC		

                    1,574		

                    23,400		

                    0.73		

                    0.75		

                    0.62		

                    -0.11		

                    -25		

                    Down		







                    37		

                    TRV - The Travelers Companies Inc.		

                    TRV		

                    1,574		

                    13,743		

                    0.73		

                    0.76		

                    0.62		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    38		

                    SO - Southern Co.		

                    SO		

                    1,557		

                    30,350		

                    0.73		

                    0.81		

                    0.61		

                    -6.47		

                    -2,100		

                    Down		







                    39		

                    ORCL - Oracle Corp.		

                    ORCL		

                    1,536		

                    39,093		

                    0.72		

                    0.74		

                    0.61		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    40		

                    QCOM - Qualcomm Inc.		

                    QCOM		

                    1,500		

                    21,893		

                    0.70		

                    0.55		

                    0.59		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    41		

                    WMT - Wal-Mart		

                    WMT		

                    1,470		

                    20,383		

                    0.69		

                    0.69		

                    0.58		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    42		

                    TGT - Target Corp.		

                    TGT		

                    1,426		

                    20,761		

                    0.67		

                    0.69		

                    0.56		

                    -2.88		

                    -615		

                    Down		







                    43		

                    USB - U.S. Bancorp		

                    USB		

                    1,419		

                    33,081		

                    0.66		

                    0.62		

                    0.56		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    44		

                    IBM - International Business Machine		

                    IBM		

                    1,414		

                    8,901		

                    0.66		

                    0.63		

                    0.56		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    45		

                    TMO - Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc		

                    TMO		

                    1,402		

                    8,816		

                    0.65		

                    0.61		

                    0.55		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    46		

                    PFG - Principal Financial Group		

                    PFG		

                    1,380		

                    26,788		

                    0.64		

                    0.51		

                    0.54		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    47		

                    TAP - Molson Coors Brewing Company		

                    TAP		

                    1,360		

                    12,390		

                    0.63		

                    0.58		

                    0.54		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    48		

                    UPS - United Parcel Services Cl B		

                    UPS		

                    1,347		

                    12,315		

                    0.63		

                    0.62		

                    0.53		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    49		

                    UNH - United Health Group Inc.		

                    UNH		

                    1,298		

                    9,270		

                    0.61		

                    0.61		

                    0.51		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		







                    50		

                    MS - Morgan Stanley Dean Witter D		

                    MS		

                    1,280		

                    39,938		

                    0.60		

                    0.48		

                    0.51		

                    0.00		

                    0		

                    No Chg		










AMERICAN NATIONAL REGISTERED INVESTMENT ADVISOR Sector Weightings & New Holdings






Top 5 New BuysMarriott International0.22%Johnson Controls Interanationa0.20%Mrc Global Inc0.14%Chart Industries Inc0.10%Fortive Corp0.10%




13F Sector AllocationFinance19 %Information Technology16 %Health Care11 %Consumer Discretionary11 %Utilities & Telecommunications9 %






AMERICAN NATIONAL REGISTERED INVESTMENT ADVISOR AUM, Portfolio Value and Historical 13F
American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc had $253.39 million assets under management as of Friday, March 28, 2014. The historical portfolio values of the fund were: 
$176,114,000 in 2013Q3 – 13F Filing Available
$197,526,000 in 2013Q4 – 13F Filing Available
$199,805,000 in 2014Q1 – 13F Filing Available
$211,208,000 in 2014Q2 – 13F Filing Available
$208,608,000 in 2014Q3 – 13F Filing Available
$217,011,000 in 2014Q4 – 13F Filing Available
$208,425,000 in 2015Q1 – 13F Filing Available
$206,376,000 in 2015Q2 – 13F Filing Available
$191,804,000 in 2015Q3 – 13F Filing Available
$204,837,000 in 2015Q4 – 13F Filing Available
$206,532,000 in 2016Q1 – 13F Filing Available
$215,223,000 in 2016Q2 – 13F Filing Available
$214,388,000 in 2016Q3 – 13F Filing Available
Subsidiaries/Series: American National Insurance Company
*Institutional Portfolio Holdings information is filed by institutions with over $100 million in AUM on form 13F with the SEC.
*% AUM is the stock or security value as a percentage of the assets under management. AUM is taken from the latest fund filed SEC Adv. 
*The portfolio holdings report is limited to stocks and stock options of common and other shares, convertible preferred and convertible bonds. The report does not include cash, real estate and fixed income securities.
*Sentiment could be wrong because the fund might have increase or decrease its portfolio because of investments inflow or because an increase in short positions.


Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.












 





Free Email Newsletter
    Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:







Hedge Fund NewsTop 10 CITADEL ADVISORS 13F Holdings in Q3 2015DF DENT & CO INC Just Released Its Q3 2015 Stock PositionsMAVERICK CAPITAL Top 10 Holdings in Q3 2015Analyzing Ken Griffins CITADEL ADVISORS Stock Holdings in Q3 2015LONE PINE CAPITAL Top 10 13F Positions in Q3 2015Guru NewsFelix Zulauf Sees a Stock Market Correction Coming. This Rally S&P 500 (INDEXSP:.INX) Will Be Short-LivedMarc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and GoldJim Grant: The Next Thing Might Be Helicopter Money. What to Buy and Where He Sees Investment OpportunitiesKyle Bass Bearish on Emerging Markets for at least 2 More Years. Looking to Short CurrenciesDavid Tepper Gets Defensive. Is it Time to Get Out of The Stock Market?


Macro NewsChina Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking CrisisAre US – Russian Relations A Zero-Sum Game?US and Russia have launched direct talks on the conflict in SyriaYuan Drops as PBOC Cuts Reference Rate by Most Since DevaluationCould the market crash like 1987?—put volume spike argues low is nearCTAs NewsRed Rock Just Published Report About The Trend Following Landscape & How CTAs’ Performance Must Be AnalyzedHow to Implement Dual Momentum for non-US InvestorsDo Commodity Trading Advisors (CTAs) Really Provide Crisis Alpha, Equity Hedge and Are Long Volatility?























﻿







Hedge Funds – Octafinance



















































 








Wednesday, 26 July 2017

























 

Menu



Featured News


						2 years ago - Alphabet Inc (NASDAQ:GOOGL) Tests Its Ad Technology On Billboards To Cushion Itself Against Ad Blocks


						2 years ago - China Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking Crisis


						2 years ago - Marc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and Gold


						2 years ago - Carl Icahn Criticizes the Fed. Feels Bad For Investors Buying Junk Bonds


						2 years ago - John Burbank: European QE Can’t Save The Markets Same As the U.S. Quantitative Easing. Everything Will Be Liquidated









Home » Hedge Funds 

Hedge Funds 

Share with your friendsYour NameYour EmailRecipient EmailEnter a MessageI read this article and found it very interesting, thought it might be interesting for you. The article is called Hedge Funds and is was published by Octafinance.com at http://www.octafinance.com/hedge-funds/.CaptchaSubmit
Hedge Funds Database
In our Free Hedge Funds Database we have listed more than 4000+ hedge funds and institutional investors. You can see the fund’s summary, employees, AUM, portfolio values, historical 13F, current portfolio, holdings, new positions, sector weights, sentiment, turnover, top 10 holdings and more.
What is a Hedge Fund? A Closer Look at Hedge Funds.
There are plenty of investment vehicles that financially savvy individuals can think about investing in or tracking. The hedge fund is just one of those, but it is also the one that is worth looking at. There’s an air of mystery about this type of investment vehicle, but it is not always a tough nut to crack. What investors need to do is to educate themselves on what hedge funds are and to understand what risks they should expect to expose their investments to.
How Do Hedge Funds Work?
Hedge funds are considered as viable alternatives to the existing forms of investment on the financial markets. However, it is not open to every individual investor. Rather, the funds are more ideal for people and institutions that have significant amount of assets that they want to be managed and grown. Managers typically pool together the assets of their clients to create a unified fund, and then they make their trades and investments using that single fund.
It is theoretically similar to mutual funds, but they differ in the techniques. That’s the reason why it’s not open to individual investors. There are significant risks involved – aside from traditional investment vehicles like the popular mutual funds and stock market options as well as bonds, hedge fund managers lean more towards high risk but sophisticated trading techniques to realize significant profits for their clients’ portfolio.
Adding to the risk exposure is the fact that hedge funds are not as closely regulated as the other financial instruments. Hedge fund managers are not always required to make filings and reports to the Securities and Exchange Commission, but that’s on a case to case basis. If the assets are large enough, the SEC will require reports. Hedge fund managers, however, are bound by law to protect their clients’ investments or face anti-fraud measures.
A Brief History of Hedge Funds
Hedge funds have a very long history. People and institutions began investing in this vehicle at the early 21st century. The funds never lost popularity over time. Before the recession hit, there was a total value of US$1.93 trillion being managed by hedge fund managers worldwide. The industry had a brief hiccup afterwards, because of the sub-prime mortgage crisis, but it eventually recovered. This is a testimony to how popular hedge funds really are, and how much investors are willing to trust their assets to managers.
Hedge fund assets totaled $2 trillion worldwide by April 2011, just three years after the crisis burst. By the third quarter of 2014, the worldwide value of assets under management or AUM is at $2.38 trillion and may continue to grow in the next years.
Hedge Fund Strategies
Hedge fund managers do not subscribe to a single strategy but, rather, they employ a combination of various strategies. It is not uncommon to find hedge fund managers putting some of the money in their management to purchase securities derivatives.
There are, however, some popular strategies that hedge fund managers acknowledge and use. Hedge fund managers will exercise any strategy and option within their discretion in response to several factors in the market.
Here are some of the strategies that hedge fund managers could use, either by itself or in tandem with other techniques in managing assets:

Global macro

This type of strategy relies on identifying macroeconomic events that take place around the world to make investment decisions. Managers generally look at the big picture globally to identify potential entry points for profitable investments. The Global Macro approach leverages multiple markets, and managers will employ long and short investment strategies to maximize profits from volatile market movements. This approach is very flexible, and very diversified as well because there are many variations of sub-strategy under this umbrella.

Directional

The directional strategy does not pay too much attention to what is happening to markets on a global basis. Instead, directional strategy dictates that fund managers look at each individual market movement when picking ideal investments. A typical action under this strategy is to invest in equities with an eye for the long term, and to couple that position with short-term buying and selling to hedge against risk.

Event-driven

Hedge fund managers following this philosophy are focused in following corporate events and leveraging their assets to earn from the market movement influenced by these occurrences. For instance, company consolidations and mergers can make possible upward movements in price. Event-driven hedge fund management will typically take positions before or after such events take place in order to leverage and earn profits from the price movements that occur. Even bankruptcy declarations can also spur action from event-driven hedge fund managers.

Relative value

Relative event hedge fund management focuses on finding price discrepancies and investing on those. This is the most technical of all the four management strategies discussed so far. Analysis is very comprehensive and somewhat holistic, as there are many types of analysis carried out under this strategy to identify the profitable price discrepancies.
How Do Hedge Fund Managers Approach Risk?
As mentioned above, hedge funds are not advisable for all types of investors because of the amount of risk involved in their operation. That is where risk mitigation comes in. In fact, managers operating in the hedge fund industry are described as being the most meticulous – they use the most stringent and the most precise means of protecting investments against the risks that the volatility of the market brings.
The most common method of reducing the risk exposure of managed assets is to diversify. The entirety of the funds used to set up the hedge funds are split between various investments, and varying investment positions. For instance, some of the funds may be put into long-term positions in low-risk, low-return funds that can steadily gain in the passage of time.
A portion of the funds may be invested in high-risk, high-return investment positions that the hedge fund manager may monitor in the short term, taking into consideration the risk factor and market environment.
In addition, hedge fund companies may employ risk officers. These are not people who are directly involved in trading, but have knowledge in how markets work. These risk officers will focus on identifying long and short-term risks to the assets under management, and will then work on creating a comprehensive risk management strategy that will be applied by the hedge fund managers for their managed assets.
Other techniques for managing risk in hedge funds include using risk management methodologies as well as operational due diligence.
Offshore and Onshore Hedge Funds
Because of their popularity and the global nature of their investment, hedge fund managers can be found all over the world. There are two types of hedge fund management companies, and they are the onshore and offshore hedge fund managers. Their differences lie mainly in the levying of tax on the investors’ earnings.
Offshore hedge fund managers give their investors the advantage of minimal tax consequences. For example, US-based investors who enjoy tax exemptions on their investments, particularly in retirement funds, will turn to offshore hedge funds. This helps them avoid being taxed for their income from the hedge funds.
On the other hand, if offshore hedge funds invest in instruments and securities in the United States, they can expect the US government to slap withholding taxes on their investments. However, there are no capital gains tax involved here – this is to make sure that offshore investors are not double-taxed for any increase on the value of their assets. Only their local jurisdiction has the legal right to levy any taxes on the investors for gains they see from their investments.
The presence of both onshore and offshore hedge management funds make the taxation more flexible and more personalized according to each investor’s personal expectations in taxation. In addition, it encourages global investment because of the measures imposed specifically to avoid the horrors of double-taxation – a common fear among investors who have eyes on diversifying globally.
Prominent Centers of Investment
The United States remains the center of global hedge fund management. 70% of the hedge fund managers that oversee the progress of global funds are based in the United States. The Securities and Exchange Commission has in its registry nearly 4,000 financial experts, as of April 2012, who handled management of hedge funds. These are found across the US, but most of them are based in New York City and Connecticut’s Gold Coast.
As for European hedge funds, London is the home of the managers with over 800 of them found in the city. In 2011, these firms were responsible for managing 85% of the hedge fund assets from continental Europe.
There is a growing market in Asia, particularly in Japan. Growing economic centers Hong Kong and Singapore are also experiencing a growth in hedge fund assets under management, but it will be some time before they achieve the demand in hedge fund managers enjoyed by the US and London in Europe. In fact, most of the hedge funds from Asia are managed by offshore companies based in these two centers.
Hedge Fund Industry – Assets Under Management




(USD Billions)
4rd Qtr 2014
3rd Qtr 2014
2nd Qtr 2014
1st Qtr 2014


Hedge Funds
$2478.6B
$2380.5B
$2339.4B
$2259.9B


Funds of Funds
$448.3B
$457.0B
$462.5B
$485.4B


Sectors






Convertible Arbitrage
$29.5B
$30.6B
$31.2B
$31.1B


Distressed Securities
$180.1B
$177.1B
$170.2B
$162.4B


Emerging Markets
$272.9B
$274.3B
$271.2B
$256.1B


Equity Long Bias
$208.8B
$203.1B
$200.9B
$194.6B


Equity Long/Short
$199.4B
$193.4B
$200.2B
$204.4B


Equity Long-Only
$130.5B
$125.2B
$125.2B
$116.8B


Equity Market Neutral
$43.4B
$37.9B
$34.1B
$32.2B


Event Driven
$290.9B
$285.1B
$275.6B
$251.0B


Fixed Income
$377.5B
$380.4B
$373.1B
$339.9B


Macro
$204.0B
$195.1B
$192.5B
$195.1B


Merger Arbitrage
$31.3B
$32.3B
$28.5B
$24.8B


Multi-Strategy
$276.1B
$264.2B
$254.0B
$276.5B


Other
$96.2B
$115.4B
$115.4B
$128.6B


Sector Specific
$138.1B
$131.7B
$132.2B
$127.6B



Hedge Funds are not the only alternative way to invest in the investment universe. A different class of investment are Managed Futures.

 
Commodity trading advisors are these that provide managed futures accounts or funds and they have very different return profile and correlations than hedge funds. Managed Futures offer a good way to diversify hedge fund or other traditional investments and in some cases could also offer lower minimum investment requirements. Because hedge funds are usually stock picking and don’t provide crisis alpha, managed funds which do, are a good way to avoid painful market correction.
Hedge Fund News
We offer completely free hedge fund news on more than 4000+ funds and their managers. Read about their traders, portfolios, strategies and returns. Don’t forget to also visit our hedge fund returns section where we have ranked the top 60 hedge funds by annualized returns since inception and listed their trading strategies and styles.

Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.












 





Free Email Newsletter
    Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:







Hedge Fund NewsTop 10 CITADEL ADVISORS 13F Holdings in Q3 2015DF DENT & CO INC Just Released Its Q3 2015 Stock PositionsMAVERICK CAPITAL Top 10 Holdings in Q3 2015Analyzing Ken Griffins CITADEL ADVISORS Stock Holdings in Q3 2015LONE PINE CAPITAL Top 10 13F Positions in Q3 2015Guru NewsFelix Zulauf Sees a Stock Market Correction Coming. This Rally S&P 500 (INDEXSP:.INX) Will Be Short-LivedMarc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and GoldJim Grant: The Next Thing Might Be Helicopter Money. What to Buy and Where He Sees Investment OpportunitiesKyle Bass Bearish on Emerging Markets for at least 2 More Years. Looking to Short CurrenciesDavid Tepper Gets Defensive. Is it Time to Get Out of The Stock Market?


Macro NewsChina Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking CrisisAre US – Russian Relations A Zero-Sum Game?US and Russia have launched direct talks on the conflict in SyriaYuan Drops as PBOC Cuts Reference Rate by Most Since DevaluationCould the market crash like 1987?—put volume spike argues low is nearCTAs NewsRed Rock Just Published Report About The Trend Following Landscape & How CTAs’ Performance Must Be AnalyzedHow to Implement Dual Momentum for non-US InvestorsDo Commodity Trading Advisors (CTAs) Really Provide Crisis Alpha, Equity Hedge and Are Long Volatility?Futures NewsVictor Sperandeo Believes the Risk/Reward for Commodities Is 1/10. Recommends 5%-10% Allocation: iPath Bloomberg Commodity exchange-traded note (DJP)For Commodities, It’s 2008 All Over Again. 18 of the 22 components in the Bloomberg Commodity Index have dropped at least 20%Morgan Stanley Joins’s Gold Bearish Camp And Sees The Possibility of Gold Decreasing to $800 Per OunceRussian Majors Rosneft, Gazprom and Lukoil sit pretty at US$60/bblFour Houston oil companies among Goldman Sachs’ picks for likely acquisition targets : EOG Resources (NYSE:EOG), Noble Energy (NYSE:NBL), Anadarko Petroleum (NYSE:APC) and Cabot Oil & Gas (NYSE:COG)


























Jul 17, 2017 - American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc. Buys Tesoro Corp, Sells Western Refining Inc - GuruFocus.com 


















Jul 17, 2017 - American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc. Buys Tesoro Corp, Sells Western Refining Inc - GuruFocus.com Jul 17, 2017










Home




 Homepage


 Membership Levels


 Membership Data Coverage


 Complete Stock List


 Founder's Message


 The Book


 FREE Trial






Screeners


Value Screens 


 All-In-One Screener


 Industry Overview


 Ben Graham Net-Net


 Undervalued Predictable


 Buffett-Munger Screener


 Magic Formula (Greenblatt)


 Historical Low P/S List


 Historical Low P/B List


 Peter Lynch Screen


 High Short Interest


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Lows


 52-Week/3Y/5Y Highs


 Predictable Companies


 S&P 500 Grid


 Dividend Stocks


 Spin Off List




Downloads | Tools


  Excel Add-In GURUF


 Manual of Stocks™


 Download Financial Data


 Download Guru Portfolios


 Download Stock PDFs


 Download Insider Data


  API


 Mobile App




Strategies


 Performances


 Buffett-Munger


 Undervalued Predictable


 Low P/S


 Low P/B


 Broadest Owned


 Most Weighted






Gurus




 Latest Guru Picks


 Real Time Picks


 List of Gurus (Personalize)


 Gurus Portfolios


 Scoreboard


 Top 10 Holdings View


 Sector Picks


 International Picks


 Aggregated Portfolio


 Consensus Picks


 Guru Bargains


 Hot Picks


 Industry Trends


 Geographic Trend


 ETFs


 Options


 European Shorting






Insiders




 All Insiders


 CEO Buys/Sales


 CFO Buys/Sales


 Insider Cluster


 Guru+Insider Double Buys


 Triple Buys/Sales


 Insider Trends


 Canadian Insider


 Dutch Insider






Market


Market Valuation


 Economic Data


 Industry Overview


 Market-Cap/GDP Valuation


 Global Market Valuation


 Shiller P/E


 Shiller P/E By Sectors


 Buffett Assets Allocation




By Country


 USA


 Australia


 Canada


 China


 Germany


 India


 Japan


 UK


 More...






Articles


Articles


 Editor's Picks


 GuruFocus Research


 Value Ideas


 Interviews with Gurus


 Top Ranked


 Value Idea Contest


 Videos


 Following Authors




Submit Articles


 Writers Wanted


 Value Contest Winners


 Submit Articles Online


 My Articles






Conference




 Value Conference


 Speakers


 Location/Venue


 Register


 After Conference Gathering (Free Drinks)






Tutorials




 Tutorials & Webinars


 FAQ


 Contact Us






Log In




 Free Sign-up


 Log In


 7-Day Free Trial 






Subscribe




 Free Trial ($399/Year)


 Refer a Friend & Earn $50














Search
Compare

Search ▾










Get 7-Day Free Trial



My Portfolios▾
                        
Portfolios Overview
Create New Portfolio
Portfolio Contest


My Gurus▾
                        
Quick Browse
Personalize

My Gurus

Premium Gurus 
Premium Plus Investors 


























 How  to  use  GuruFocus  -  Tutorials
 What  Is  in  the  GuruFocus  Premium  Membership?
A DIY Guide on How to Invest Using Guru Strategies

 insiderArticles 
Bookmark

Print


Tweet















Bookmark Name:









			This page was added to your Bookmark.
		



Members Only. Please Sign Up or Log In first.




			Bookmark of this page has been deleted.
		



American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc. Buys Tesoro Corp, Sells Western Refining IncJuly 17, 2017 |  About: 
TSO  +0%
WNR  +0% 



Investment company American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc. buys Tesoro Corp, sells Western Refining Inc during the 3-months ended 2017-06-30, according to the most recent filings of the investment company, American National Registered Investment Advisor, I. As of 2017-06-30, American National Registered Investment Advisor, I owns 249 stocks with a total value of $239 million.  These are the details of the buys and sells.New Purchases: TSO, Reduced Positions: COF, LB, OXY, Sold Out: WNR, For the details of American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc.'s stock buys and sells, go to http://www.gurufocus.com/StockBuy.php?GuruName=American+National+Registered+Investment+Advisor%2C+Inc.These are the top 5 holdings of American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc.Apple Inc (AAPL) - 51,243 shares, 3.08% of the total portfolio. Microsoft Corp (MSFT) - 76,896 shares, 2.21% of the total portfolio.  Shares reduced by 0.13%JPMorgan Chase & Co (JPM) - 43,116 shares, 1.65% of the total portfolio.  Shares reduced by 0.52%Johnson & Johnson (JNJ) - 29,290 shares, 1.62% of the total portfolio.  Shares reduced by 0.12%The Home Depot Inc (HD) - 24,546 shares, 1.57% of the total portfolio. New Purchase: Tesoro Corp (TSO)Warning! GuruFocus has detected 5 Warning Signs with TSO. Click here to check it out. 
TSO 30-Year Financial DataThe intrinsic value of TSOPeter Lynch Chart of TSOAmerican National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc. initiated holdings in  Tesoro Corp.  The purchase prices were between $75.49 and $94.45, with an estimated average price of $84.16.   The stock is now traded at around $96.97. The impact to the portfolio due to this purchase was 0.23%. The holdings were 5,872 shares as of 2017-06-30. Sold Out: Western Refining Inc (WNR)American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc. sold out the holdings in  Western Refining Inc.  The sale prices were between $32.99 and $36.67, with an estimated average price of $35.09. Here is the complete portfolio of American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc.. Also check out:
1. American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc.'s Undervalued Stocks
2. American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc.'s Top Growth Companies, and
3. American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc.'s High Yield stocks
4. Stocks that American National Registered Investment Advisor, Inc. keeps buying







  Currently 0.00/512345  Rating:  0.0/5 (0 votes)  


Subscribe
            via Email
Subscribe RSS





Comments


Please leave your comment:






More GuruFocus Links



Latest Guru Picks
Value Strategies


Warren Buffett Portfolio
Ben Graham Net-Net


Real Time Picks
Buffett-Munger Screener


Aggregated Portfolio
Undervalued Predictable


ETFs, Options
Low P/S Companies


Insider Trends
10-Year Financials


52-Week Lows
Interactive Charts


Model Portfolios
DCF Calculator


RSS Feed 
Monthly Newsletters


The  All-In-One Screener
Portfolio Tracking Tool










                        GuruFocus has detected 5 Warning Signs with Tesoro Corp $TSO.                    

                        More than 500,000 people have already joined GuruFocus to track the stocks they follow and exchange investment ideas.
                    





















→Performances of the stocks mentioned by  insider




→User
            Generated Screeners

ahcukaValueolanderfGoodmerknt84my4LuddyNEW SCHOOL VAL+MOMOmpacholskaStrong in Europempacholskaonly cheap in EuropesamahajoeOptimumsamahajoePrice/EBITDAgoukaradiBanks-Global & Americaspbarker46Dividends

→TSO Price Chart





$97.8 (1y: +24%)







Last 5 Quotes


My Portfolio






  Portfolio: Track My Stocks







To view my portfolio


Not a member yet?
Sign up now for a free account







 













Select portfolio(s):








                        Create a new portfolio



Why you are interested?



            Your selection and notes will be stored in your portfolio.
        


Login to add portfolio















Get WordPress Plugins for easy affiliate links on Stock Tickers and Guru Names
                    | Earn affiliate commissions by embedding GuruFocus Charts

                                                GuruFocus Affiliate Program: Earn up to $400 per referral.  ( Learn More) 













Home  About   Jobs    Advertise    Site Map    Term of Use    Privacy Policy     RSS    Mobile App     Email Alerts    Referral Program    Affiliate Program    FAQ    Contact Us
                               

                © 2004-2017                GuruFocus.com, LLC. All Rights Reserved.
            


                    Disclaimers: GuruFocus.com is not operated by a broker, a dealer, or a registered investment adviser. Under no circumstances does any information posted on GuruFocus.com represent a recommendation to buy or sell a security. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The gurus may buy and sell securities before and after any particular article and report and information herein is published, with respect to the securities discussed in any article and report posted herein. In no event shall GuruFocus.com be liable to any member, guest or third party for any damages of any kind arising out of the use of any content or other material published or available on GuruFocus.com, or relating to the use of, or inability to use, GuruFocus.com or any content, including, without limitation, any investment losses, lost profits, lost opportunity, special, incidental, indirect, consequential or punitive damages. Past performance is a poor indicator of future performance. The information on this site, and in its related newsletters, is not intended to be, nor does it constitute, investment advice or recommendations. The information on this site is in no way guaranteed for completeness, accuracy or in any other way. The gurus listed in this website are not affiliated with GuruFocus.com, LLC.



                    Stock quotes provided by InterActive Data. Fundamental company data provided by Morningstar, updated daily.

















GF Chat {{numOfNotice}}




























×
Manage BookMarks





Close








FEEDBACK
















﻿

























Seaspan Corporation (NYSE:SSW) Stake Held by American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Seaspan Corporation
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Seaspan Corporation with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Somewhat Positive Media Coverage Somewhat Likely to Impact Intercontinental Exchange (NYSE:ICE) Stock Price
Mason Street Advisors LLC Raises Position in Viad Corp (VVI)
El Paso Electric Company (EE) Raised to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research
Mason Street Advisors LLC Increases Stake in ePlus inc. (PLUS)
Ameritas Investment Partners Inc. Invests $115,000 in Cubic Corporation (CUB)
Raymond James Financial Services Advisors Inc. Lowers Position in Kinross Gold Corporation (KGC)
Mason Street Advisors LLC Has $192,000 Stake in BioTelemetry, Inc. (BEAT)
Mason Street Advisors LLC Boosts Position in National Bank Holdings Corporation (NBHC)
Raymond James Financial Services Advisors Inc. Has $131,000 Stake in Synergy Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (SGYP)
Ameritas Investment Partners Inc. Invests $112,000 in Aerojet Rocketdyne Holdings, Inc. (AJRD)
Raymond James Financial Services Advisors Inc. Has $104,000 Position in Celldex Therapeutics, Inc. (CLDX)
Ameritas Investment Partners Inc. Buys Shares of 3,203 Comfort Systems USA, Inc. (FIX)
Time Warner Inc. (TWX) Stake Raised by Raymond James Financial Services Advisors Inc.
Exterran Corporation (EXTN) Rating Increased to Strong-Buy at Zacks Investment Research
Navistar International Corporation (NYSE:NAV) Upgraded by BidaskClub to “Hold”
PPL Corporation (PPL) Upgraded by Zacks Investment Research to “Buy”
Ross Stores, Inc. (ROST) Lifted to Buy at Zacks Investment Research
Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Limited (TEVA) Stake Increased by Kempner Capital Management Inc.
Citigroup Inc. Analysts Give Kimberly-Clark Corporation (NYSE:KMB) a $134.00 Price Target
Magellan Midstream Partners L.P. (NYSE:MMP) Upgraded to “Hold” at BidaskClub


 


Seaspan Corporation (NYSE:SSW) Stake Held by American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.

Posted by Tim Parker on Jul 22nd, 2017 // No Comments 

American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. held its position in shares of Seaspan Corporation (NYSE:SSW) during the second quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 21,600 shares of the shipping company’s stock at the end of the second quarter. American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.’s holdings in Seaspan Corporation were worth $154,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
A number of other institutional investors have also modified their holdings of SSW. Private Advisor Group LLC acquired a new position in shares of Seaspan Corporation during the first quarter worth $111,000. Ladenburg Thalmann Financial Services Inc. increased its stake in Seaspan Corporation by 215.3% in the fourth quarter. Ladenburg Thalmann Financial Services Inc. now owns 17,561 shares of the shipping company’s stock worth $161,000 after buying an additional 11,991 shares in the last quarter. Bank of America Corp DE increased its stake in Seaspan Corporation by 9.3% in the first quarter. Bank of America Corp DE now owns 20,822 shares of the shipping company’s stock worth $144,000 after buying an additional 1,775 shares in the last quarter. Highbridge Capital Management LLC purchased a new stake in Seaspan Corporation during the fourth quarter worth about $193,000. Finally, BlueCrest Capital Management Ltd purchased a new stake in Seaspan Corporation during the first quarter worth about $163,000. 14.33% of the stock is owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Seaspan Corporation alerts:



Seaspan Corporation (SSW) opened at 6.62 on Friday. The stock’s market capitalization is $724.77 million. Seaspan Corporation has a 12-month low of $5.02 and a 12-month high of $15.45. The company has a 50-day moving average price of $6.22 and a 200-day moving average price of $7.18. 




Seaspan Corporation (NYSE:SSW) last announced its quarterly earnings data on Wednesday, April 26th. The shipping company reported $0.15 EPS for the quarter, topping the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $0.13 by $0.02. Seaspan Corporation had a positive return on equity of 8.08% and a negative net margin of 12.29%. The firm had revenue of $201.30 million for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $204.09 million. During the same quarter last year, the business posted $0.33 earnings per share. The firm’s revenue was down 6.6% compared to the same quarter last year. Analysts expect that Seaspan Corporation will post $0.71 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, July 31st. Shareholders of record on Thursday, July 20th will be given a $0.125 dividend. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Tuesday, July 18th. This represents a $0.50 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 7.55%. Seaspan Corporation’s dividend payout ratio is currently -32.26%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: “Seaspan Corporation (NYSE:SSW) Stake Held by American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc.” was reported by BNB Daily and is the sole property of of BNB Daily. If you are viewing this piece on another domain, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of United States & international copyright & trademark law. The correct version of this piece can be accessed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/22/seaspan-corporation-nysessw-stake-held-by-american-national-registered-investment-advisor-inc.html. 
SSW has been the subject of a number of recent research reports. Stifel Nicolaus restated a “hold” rating and set a $7.00 price target on shares of Seaspan Corporation in a research note on Friday, July 14th. BidaskClub upgraded Seaspan Corporation from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a research note on Thursday, July 6th. Citigroup Inc. upgraded Seaspan Corporation from a “sell” rating to a “neutral” rating and set a $7.00 price objective for the company in a research note on Tuesday, May 2nd. Zacks Investment Research downgraded Seaspan Corporation from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research note on Tuesday, July 4th. Finally, Credit Suisse Group AG downgraded Seaspan Corporation from a “neutral” rating to an “underperform” rating and cut their price objective for the company from $7.00 to $6.00 in a research note on Monday, May 1st. Five research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, seven have given a hold rating and one has given a buy rating to the stock. The stock has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $6.94.
Seaspan Corporation Company Profile
Seaspan Corporation is an independent charter owner and manager of containerships. The Company charters pursuant to long-term, fixed-rate time charters with various container liner companies. As of February 20, 2017, it had operated a fleet of 88 containerships and had entered into contracts for the purchase of an additional eight new building containerships. 
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding SSW? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Seaspan Corporation (NYSE:SSW).

 
Receive News & Ratings for Seaspan Corporation Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Seaspan Corporation and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















  


TD Ameritrade Institutional - Independent Registered Investment Advisor Custodian Services









































Skip to main content


















Main Content Area





Celebrate freedom all summer long.
Seize your own independence by becoming an RIA. We’ll help you get inspired with stories of advisors just like you who let true freedom ring and haven’t looked back.

Discover Their Stories







Scott Collins
TD Ameritrade Institutional



 Get a glimpse into what your transition might look like with our quick, informative tool. 
Explore your independence now






There needed to be a better way to serve clients.Discover why they chose true freedom








Introducing Veo One®
Bring your Veo integrated third-party technology onto one unified platform and gain a complete view of your clients and your business.

Learn More







Jon Patullo
TD Ameritrade Institutional



 Accessible anytime, anywhere and created with a responsive design to help you work smarter. 
Learn more about the next generation of open architecture






Become an integrated technology powerhouseSee what Veo One integrated tech providers are saying








Move beyond client satisfaction.
Understand the key drivers of engagement and create long-term client advocates for your firm.

Learn more







Vanessa Oligino
TD Ameritrade Institutional



 Building a client centric firm is about cultivating relationships beyond the financials and consistently exceeding expectations. 
Learn how we can help you transform your client experience strategy






A client-centric focus is key to engaging with clients across generations.Learn more about our program











What Makes You Super?


It’s RIAs to the rescue! Discover the hidden superpower that helps you save the day.


Unveil Your Superpower 






News



07/18/17 - TD Ameritrade Institutional Names Kate Healy to New Role: Head of NextGen and Women's Advocacy



Archives 






Upcoming Events


January 31,2018

2018 National Conference



Learn more 






Contact Us

For more information on going independent
Call Us800-934-6124


Contact us 


















































  


TD Ameritrade Institutional RIA Custodian Services: Independent RIA Support & Resources









































Skip to main content






























Overview

"We have the ear of TD Ameritrade. They are listening to what we're asking for."
Diane Pearson, Advisor, Legend Financial Advisors

Watch:
How we continue to support RIAs





Tell us where you want to take your business and we’ll help you get there.  We provide you with the tools, support, and capabilities you need to do the very best job for your clients and take your business to the next level. Your success is our business.
















Smart Operational Solutions


When you improve your operational efficiency, you can do more for your business, your clients, and your bottom line. Uncover tools and support to help you work smarter, not harder.




World Class Service,  

Trading Services,  

Clearing and Custody





Learn more








Innovative Technology


Run your business your way. We’ve designed our technology solutions to integrate seamlessly with many of the solutions providers you already use. So you can work smarter and more efficiently.




Veo®,  

Veo One®,  

Veo Open Access®,  

iRebal®,  

thinkpipes®,  

AdvisorClient®,  

Data Security





Learn more








Customized Practice Management


Maximize your business potential by working with our experienced consultants to uncover new opportunities to take your business to the next level.




Areas of Focus,  

How we Deliver





Learn more








Flexible Investment Solutions


Every client has different needs. That’s why we give you an open architecture platform - so you can access the strategies you need to choose the right investment mix for your clients.




Investment Products,  

Individual Retirement,  

Estate Planning,  

Managed Accounts,  

Research





Learn more








Steadfast Advocacy


We share your belief in the fiduciary standard and that’s why we’re dedicated to supporting Independent Registered Investment Advisors. Learn about how we advocate for RIAs.




Learn more





















Call Us:



800-934-6124



Learn more about how we can help you achieve your business vision.
Contact Us 





















































  


Benefits of Being a Break-Away Broker -  Why Become an Independent RIA









































Skip to main content






























Overview

"I don't regret one minute of it. I don't regret the decision at all."
Christopher Van Slyke, Partner and Co-Founder, WorthPointe, LLC

Watch:
Hear advisors talk about their decision





What if you could build your own business – one where you call the shots, your clients benefit, and you focus on what you enjoy? What if we helped you think through the possibilities and gave you all the support and tools you need to help you build the firm you’ve always wanted to work for? Now you can. Read on to find out how.
















Understanding Independence


What does it mean to be an RIA? Is being an RIA right for you? What is it really like? If you’re curious, these are the right questions to be asking. And you’ve come to the right place to find answers.




Advantages,  

Trends





Learn More








Considerations for Independence


There are economic and business factors to consider before you make the move. But there’s more than that - becoming an RIA is a commitment to the lifestyle, the culture, and the fiduciary standard. Let's explore if you and your clients can benefit from the RIA model.




Financial,  

Lifestyle,  

Exploring Independence





Learn More








Choosing the Right Custodian


Commitment. Coaching. Community. Doing more for you and your business is part of who we are. We’ve worked with advisors to design technology, products, and programs that can help take your practice where your ambitions lead.




Learn More





















Call Us:



800-934-6124



The path to independence begins with a conversation.
Contact Us 






Explore IndependenceJoin or Start, our Exploring Independence tool will help you decide.Get started 














































TD Ameritrade Institutional | TDA4advisors Blog





































800-934-6124
About UsContact UsBlogEventsNews 

Follow us :

Facebook
LinkedIn
Twitter
YouTube







Welcome to the
TDA4advisors Blog
We are excited to share a collection of relevant, timely, and insightful articles that can help you grow and strengthen your business. TD Ameritrade and leading industry experts will be contributing their unique perspectives on the challenges and opportunities that RIAs are facing today. Thank you for joining our community and we look forward to connecting with you!
+496  


"




"








July 19, 2017



 by Skip Schweiss 
President, TD Ameritrade Trust CompanyManaging Director of Advisor Advocacy & Industry Affairs



No Dog Days for Fiduciary Standard


To say June 2017 was a busy time for the fiduciary standard would be an understatement. It was the busiest month I’ve seen on the financial advisor regulation front in many years.
Two federal agencies, one state regulator and two influential professional organizations all announced higher standards of conduct for financial advisors. That’s encouraging, in that these moves further raise awareness about the fiduciary standard of care for investors and show that the call for a client-first approach is only gathering force.
Let’s break it down. 
Read More

+2  







July 12, 2017



by Paula Forte                
Director, Human Resources, TD Ameritrade Institutional



Loving Your Job and Loving Summer, While Enjoying Both

It’s easy to understand why people look forward to summer months. For most, it represents a time to enjoy all the treasures the season has to offer, from great weather, adventurous activities, relaxation, and travel, to time well spent with family and friends. Often, summer creates lasting memories and allows us to redeem the benefits of our hard work. From a work perspective, however, it can cause unintended stress. This can stem from covering for employees who are on vacation, worrying about unanticipated issues popping up while a co-worker is out of the office, and not missing anything important while you’re on vacation. And then there’s managing childcare needs since school is out.

Here are a few tips that may alleviate unintended strain and optimize summer enjoyment. 
Read More

+3  







July 6, 2017



by TD Ameritrade Institutional                




Congrats NextGen RIA Scholarship and Grant Winners: The Big Apple Awaits


Throw your hands in the air for the 2017 TD Ameritrade Institutional NextGen RIA Scholarship and Grant Winners!
 
Read More

+4  



Older Posts »






Search for:



Subscribe
Monthly Archives Monthly Archives

Select Month
 July 2017  (3)
 June 2017  (6)
 May 2017  (5)
 April 2017  (4)
 March 2017  (8)
 February 2017  (3)
 January 2017  (4)
 December 2016  (5)
 November 2016  (5)
 October 2016  (2)
 September 2016  (2)
 August 2016  (4)
 July 2016  (3)
 June 2016  (5)
 April 2016  (7)
 March 2016  (7)
 February 2016  (3)
 January 2016  (1)
 December 2015  (2)
 November 2015  (3)
 October 2015  (3)
 September 2015  (3)
 August 2015  (3)
 July 2015  (1)
 June 2015  (1)
 May 2015  (7)
 April 2015  (6)
 March 2015  (2)
 February 2015  (1)
 January 2015  (3)
 December 2014  (3)
 November 2014  (1)
 October 2014  (1)
 September 2014  (1)
 August 2014  (2)
 July 2014  (3)
 June 2014  (1)
 May 2014  (2)
 April 2014  (1)
 March 2014  (2)
 February 2014  (3)
 January 2014  (4)
 December 2013  (1)
 November 2013  (2)
 September 2013  (2)
 August 2013  (1)
 July 2013  (2)
 June 2013  (2)
 April 2013  (1)
 March 2013  (2)
 February 2013  (5)
 January 2013  (4)

  Recent Posts 

No Dog Days for Fiduciary Standard
July 19, 2017


Loving Your Job and Loving Summer, While Enjoying Both
July 12, 2017


Congrats NextGen RIA Scholarship and Grant Winners: The Big Apple Awaits
July 6, 2017


Getting Professional on Social Media
June 30, 2017


Make Today Your Independence Day
June 26, 2017


 

Live RR

Looking for insights on developing NextGen talent, creating career paths for growth, and encouraging their success?
This Why and How to Develop NextGen Talent: An Adviser’s Guide White Paper provides actionable steps to help you develop the right talent and structure the right roles for their future success.
+87  
 Tweets by @TDA4advisors








TD Ameritrade Institutional HomeAbout UsContact Us

Legal Info
Business Continuity Plan
Privacy
Financial Statements
TD Ameritrade Holding Corp.

The materials, views and opinions of third parties do not represent those of TD Ameritrade. TD Ameritrade and all third-parties mentioned are separate unaffiliated companies and are not responsible for each other’s services or policies.
TD Ameritrade has no control over how third parties may use information shared on the site.
TD Ameritrade Institutional, Division of TD Ameritrade, Inc., & TD Ameritrade Clearing, Inc., members FINRA/SIPC. TD Ameritrade Trust Company is a non-depository trust company and acts as a custodian and/or directed trustee. Brokerage services provided by TD Ameritrade, Inc. TD Ameritrade Trust Company and TD Ameritrade, Inc. are subsidiaries of TD Ameritrade Holding Corporation. . This is not an offer or solicitation for brokerage services, investment advisory services, or other products or services in any jurisdiction where we are not authorized to do business or where such offer or solicitation would be contrary to the securities laws or other local laws and regulations of that jurisdiction, including, but not limited to persons residing in Australia, Austria, Canada, France, Germany, Hong Kong, Italy, Japan, the Netherlands, Saudi Arabia, Singapore, or the United Kingdom. TD Ameritrade is a trademark jointly owned by TD Ameritrade IP Company, Inc. and The Toronto-Dominion Bank. © TD Ameritrade IP Company, Inc. All rights reserved. Used with permission. 36USC220506
+341  



Third-Party Site Disclosure
You are about to leave the TD Ameritrade Institutional website and enter an unaffiliated third-party website to access its products and services. The third-party site is governed by its posted privacy policy and terms of use, and the third party is solely responsible for the content and offerings on its website.
Click Continue to go to the third-party site, or click "", to return to the original website.





















  


TD Ameritrade Institutional Contact Information









































Skip to main content






























Contact Us

We're always here to answer any questions you may have.







We’re looking forward to talking with you and answering any questions you have about working with TD Ameritrade Institutional.















Contact form
Want to know more? We are here to help.

We're looking forward to talking with you and answering any questions you have about working with TD Ameritrade Institutional. The information you provide is completely confidential.




















We need a little more information from you. Please complete the required fields marked in red and try submitting again.







*First Name:





*Last Name:





*Email Address:





*Phone Number:





*Zip Code:





*Firm Name:





Role:



Please SelectAdministrationCEO or PresidentComplianceInvestment ProfessionalOperationsTechnologyTradingManagementOther



Firm Type:



Please SelectDually RegisteredFamily OfficeRegistered Investment AdvisorRegistered RepresentativeRetirement Plan AdvisorTPA/Record-keeperOther







Firm AUM: (please enter numbers only, i.e. 500M = 500000000)





I want to know more about:



Please SelectJoining/starting an RIAEvaluating a new custodian Business growth and efficiencyInnovations in technologyCorporate Retirement PlansOther



Please provide any additional questions or comments:


300 character(s) remaining.













Note: Your submission may take a few seconds to process.
Please do not click the submit button more than once























Call Us:



800-934-6124



Looking for insights to help your business?
Contact Us 









General Inquiries

Corporate Headquarters
200 S 108th Ave, Omaha, NE 68154-2631





























































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









   2017's Best Financial Advisors - Find a Financial Advisor Near You | SmartAsset.com                                             Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It            When would you like to retire?    1-4 years   5-9 years   10-19 years   20-29 years   30+ years   Already Retired           How do you currently manage your money?    I manage my own investments   I use retirement plans (such as a 401(k), Roth IRA, IRA)   I use a robo-advisor   I work with a financial advisor   None of the above          Would you like advice on how to manage income and expenses in retirement?    Yes   Not necessary          Would you like your advisor to perform a complete assessment of your current retirement readiness?    Yes, must have   Nice to have   Not important          How comfortable are you with investing?    I consider myself to be an expert   I'm familiar with financial concepts like ETFs, Options, Annuities but do not consider myself to be an expert   I know the basics of retirement planning   I'm a beginner          Why are you interested in an advisor?    Planning to retire soon   Just married   Recently became a parent   Came into some money   Planning for a major expense   Looking for investment advice   Other           Why are you interested in an advisor?  Other (please explain)           Are you married?    No   Yes           Are you saving jointly or separately?    Separately   Jointly          Do you own your home?    No   Yes           Have you refinanced your home recently to take advantage of low interest rates?    No   Yes          Do you currently have children under 18?    No   Yes, 1   Yes, 2   Yes, 3 or more           Would you like help creating a college savings program for your child?    No   Yes          Do you own a business?    No   Yes          If your investments dropped 10% today, what would you do?    Invest More   Do Nothing   Sell to Cut Losses          How important is it for your financial advisor to have tax expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have estate planning expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have insurance product expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Is socially responsible investing important to you?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Do you currently have a financial advisor?    No   Yes          What is your zipcode?  Zipcode           Does your financial advisor need to be within driving distance of you?    Yes   No, I am comfortable working by phone or video-conference          Please estimate your total investable assets.    Less than $25,000   $25,000 - $99,999   $100,000 - $249,999   $250,000 - $499,999   $500,000 - $999,999   Over $1,000,000          How much are you currently saving on a monthly basis?    Less than $100   $100 - $249   $250 - $499   $500 - $999   $1,000 - $1,999   Over $2,000          We are looking for your match! We're reviewing data from hundreds of certified financial advisors from our vetted and trusted network.  Location Preferences Retirement Timelines Investment Experience Asset Requirements Risk Assessment Advisor Expertise Family Planning Investable Assets      Is there anything else potential advisors should know about your needs?  (Feel free to answer 'no' if you've already provided enough information)            What email should advisors use to speak with you?   Email            What is your full name?   First and Last Name            What is your phone number?   Phone              Thank you!       Show More    Next Steps For You           Thank you!  Invest with         Invest with      Show More    Next Steps For You Get started      Sorry! Something went wrong on our end.Please refresh your browser or come back and try again later.Restart     Why do we need this information?   Thousands of advisors operate in the United States. Your answers power our matching algorithm to select the best 2-4 advisors that meet your needs.Who is SmartAsset?SmartAsset is personal finance, made simple. We read tax codes, so you don't have to. Our personal finance calculators serve more than 3 million users every month.We’ve been featured in publications like:        We only have top-quality financial advisors:   SEC Registered 5-star rated At least 5 years of experience Vetted by reputable third parties    Return to question                   Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                











Why a Raymond James Advisor - Wealth Management | Raymond James








































Find an Advisor
Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.




Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor






What Are You Planning For?

Growing My Wealth
Preserving My Wealth
Planning for Retirement
Providing for Family
Managing My Estate
Growing My Business



Advice, Products & Services

Working with a Raymond James Advisor
Investment Solutions
Financial & Retirement Planning
Estate, Charitable Giving & Trust Services
Banking & Lending Services
Insurance Solutions
Institutional Services
Private Wealth Services



Why a Raymond James Advisor

Who Our Advisors Serve
Working with a Raymond James Advisor
About Raymond James
Client Resources



Market Commentary & Insights

Economic Commentary
Investment Strategy
Bond Market Commentary & Analysis





Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management









Raymond James Accolades
The strength of Raymond James is reflected in both these ongoing accomplishments and in the consistent recognition we receive from our industry and our peers.
Grow With Us





Investment Banking

Industries of Focus
Capabilities & Coverage Areas
Transaction History
News & Insights
Leadership Team



Public Finance

Specialty Areas
Capabilities
Locations
Industry Insight
News



Equity Capital Markets

Equity Research
Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Corporate Access
Corporate & Executive Services
Equity-Linked Securities
Conferences & Events



Fixed Income Capital Markets

eFolio®
Institutional Sales
Trading
Research & Strategies



Depository Institution Services

Fixed Income Capital Markets
Investment Banking
Equity Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Equity Research
Wealth Management & Trust
Tax Credit Funds
Raymond James Bank



Additional Institutional Services

Eagle Asset Management
Institutional Consulting Services
Merchant Banking
Raymond James Bank
Tax Credit Funds
Wealth Management Services for Depositories





Corporations & Institutions
Together we take a strategic approach to capital markets, backed by the strength of full-service offerings and broad and deep industry expertise.
Explore Corporations & Institutions









Contact an AdvisorChoice® Consultant
 Have a confidential conversation with our recruiters about what your business would look like as an advisor at Raymond James.
Ready To Learn More?





Partner with Us


Affiliation Options

Traditional Employee
Alex. Brown
Independent Employee
Independent Advisor
Independent RIA
Bank & Credit Union Advisors
Custody & Clearing
New Advisors
Hybrid RIA



Resources & Support

Technology
Products
Services
Diversity & Networks



Practice Insights


In the News

Press Releases



Contact Us

Talk to a Recruiter
Join Raymond James





Advisor Opportunities
Our advisors are viewed as clients of the firm, which means we provide world-class resources and support to help run their business on their terms.
Explore Advisor Opportunities









About Raymond James
No matter the business, we believe if we do what’s right for clients, we’ll help them achieve success while also realizing our own. It’s that simple.
Learn More





About Us

Values, Mission & Pledge
Company History
Leadership Team
Social Responsibility
Accolades
Subsidiaries
Art Collection
Raymond James Stadium®
By the Numbers



Careers

Why Raymond James
Advisor Opportunities
Experienced Professionals
Students & Recent Grads
Diversity & Inclusion
Getting Hired
Department Descriptions
All Access - Careers Blog



Investors

Calendar of Events
Financial Reports
Earnings
RJF Stock Information
Analysts Covering RJF
Corporate Governance
Shareholders' Meeting
Presentations & Webcasts



News & Media

Press Releases
Media Kit
TV & Radio Capabilities
Financial Highlights
Investment & Economic Experts



Contact Us

Map & Directions
Client Assistance with Investor Access
Shareholders' and Other Interested Parties for Our Board of Directors
All Other Inquiries





Careers at Raymond James
Our associates are more than the heart and soul of our firm – they’re the key to its continued success.
Take Your Next Step











Investor Access
Discover the ease and convenience of having online access to your Raymond James accounts.

Contact Us / FAQ 
Privacy / Security
Client Resources



Broad Scope, Deep Coverage 
Raymond James’ equity research is a cornerstone of the organization.  Raymond James and its affiliates in Canada and Europe employ more than 70 research analysts who cover nearly 1,300 companies in nine highly focused industries.


eFolio®
The only truly interactive portfolio management system for financial institutions, eFolio allows you to interact with your portfolio online -- sorting, strategies, inventories, research, swaps and more.


Commission Management



Client Login

Questions?
Call us:
24 x 7 global phone support


Email us:
support@intralinks.com







Investor Access
Equity Research
eFolio
Commission Management
Tax Credit Funds





Enter Your Login ID



Enter Your Password




Enroll In Investor Access 


Remember Login ID




Forgot 
Login ID						or 
						 
Password? 
|

Login Help



 Login
Login
Login
Login












Enter Search Terms












Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management 





Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor






















Why a Raymond James Advisor






Our advisors have a 
legacy of serving clients differently.

                    It’s a more personal approach that goes far beyond an investment portfolio. It’s an ongoing and open dialogue about all aspects of your life, your goals and your financial vision. And it’s developing a long-term relationship built on understanding and trust. Your advisor is there for you throughout the planning and investing process, giving you objective and unbiased advice along the way.
                



Who Our Advisors Serve


Raymond James advisors serve clients with a variety of sophisticated financial planning needs. From families and individuals to business owners and institutions, your Raymond James advisor has the expertise and experience to provide guidance for a wide range of financial planning needs. They’ll take care of the big picture and the finer details with an approach that is as disciplined as it is strategic.
Learn More



Working with an Advisor


Your advisor is there to help you reach major milestones and all of the smaller ones in between. You’ll work together to build a customized plan just for you, taking into account all of your objectives, while weighing risk, prioritizing trade-offs and accounting for “what ifs.” And because your plan is a living document, your advisor will continually adapt it while utilizing the latest technology to identify potential unknowns and your changing needs, making adjustments that will help you reach your financial goals.
Get Started



Client Resources


Through your relationship with your Raymond James advisor, industry-leading resources are at your fingertips. You will have access to timely account information and research whenever and wherever you need it through Investor Access, which allows you to track and monitor all of your accounts in one safe and secure place.
Learn More



About Raymond James


Since day one, we have always put our clients first. Your financial well-being is our focus. And we have never lost sight of that. Our advisors take a client-first approach and have the independence to serve you as you see fit. With a conservative approach to investing and a commitment to integrity, your advisor is backed by the size and resources of Raymond James, while also having the ability to maintain a small-firm feel. This gives you the attention and support you need to reach your goals.
Learn More
















Commentary & Insights




                                    Lifestyle
                                             &vert; 
July 11, 2017                                
Should you consider a pet trust?
The name may evoke stories of heirs and heiresses setting aside enormous sums for their pets, but these trusts aren’t just for millionaires.
Read More





                                    Goal Planning
                                             &vert; 
June 27, 2017                                
Set new goals in summer
With several financial deadlines behind you, take time this summer to review your progress, set new goals and tie up loose ends. 
Read More





                                    Retirement
                                             &vert; 
July 7, 2017                                
Are you ready for an encore career?
More and more Americans are going back to work or volunteering after retirement. 
Read More



View All














Find an Advisor


Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.



Enter City, ST or Zip Code






Enter Last Name












 









	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads







































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































